It did. Thank you.
yes it is, it's called having options. 
No problem &amp; yeah it does but I ended up buying the Akai MPK mini shortly after. It's not the same but with a few tweaks it gets the job done, I'll be getting a new one once I get the cash up.  I'm just noticing the mini in the background lol
They have their moments 
I say no. Sure, you're getting OBJ. He's better than anything you're getting with that #3 pick. But you're not just losing that pick. You're also sacrificing $15M of the cap.   So it's the #3 pick and $15M of your available cap on a position that wasn't all that high on the needs list for this off-season.  Now we need to go get an edge, DT, a couple of offensive linemen, a CB and Bell with only a 2nd, 2 thirds, and maybe $50M to achieve all that.
I'll keep my eyes out for them.
It would be a tweet, natch.  ;)  [Judge Judy would probably not be amused.](https://media1.tenor.com/images/6e472cddd0782dc81632291880673b98/tenor.gif)
my guess is that everything that is calculated serverside, can be changed without doing a patch.. things like RNG and calculations that does not require system resources to calculate or execute.
It tasted closer to a baguette, with nice chewy interior. Crisps up well when heated up. Wasn’t a total throw-in-bin bad. 
Of course, I only know about flying out of DFW so maybe flying out of smaller regional airports is less expensive
Explain plz
Hey Jose, thank you for your question, and apologies for the late response!  &amp;#x200B;  Right now I'm working on establishing myself in neutral.  Figuring out when it's the right time to walk forward, how to make my opponent hesitate, be aggressive, or "fall asleep" in neutral.  Necalli is super stubby, so I need to think really hard about what I can influence my opponent to do.  It makes playing the game stressful though, and it can be difficult to divvy up all of my mental resources efficiently when I'm focusing on this particular tactic.  Definitely a work in progress.  &amp;#x200B;  I can dive into that more if you'd like.  Thanks for posting!
Very interesting! I'm 28 now and while I loved runescape and magic the gathering as a kid, I feel like I missed out by never having played d&amp;d.  By the way - does dm mean dungeon master?
Tesla has factory in China too doesn’t it
Gotta say point 4 is kinda weak. Even it is a fake leak, the tubes would be directly related to the adrenaline junkie ability. Also looks pretty fun to play so hoping it's real
Demon Avenger is one of the best classes for Hellux, CRA and HMag (it falls off after that though). It's a bold claim to make without having any other chars that can do those bosses, but it feels like its skills are specifically designed for those bosses and I would say that as a result, DA would need less funding than other classes because their mechanics make up for it. Good damage and good survivability, good mobbing, mobility, not TP based. It has a lot of cons too but it just destroys mid-game bosses.
I disagree with you but the sheer level of consumerism in some countries is pretty fucked.
Did he have a weapon? 
The Nymphomaniac films?
I love these kind of drawings
I worked it out! I am being shafted. Because my employer only lets us take 4 weeks off in the year. Any more and she starts tutting and saying how we don't have any left so we don't push it. 
Line guides! A piece of paper you slide under the blank one to show through, and keep you straight! (While writing anyway). The Well-appointed Desk has one on her website. [I'll edit with the link in a minute. ](https://www.wellappointeddesk.com/2014/11/guide-sheets-updated-graph-paper-added/)
Please see [**this post**](https://www.reddit.com/r/MathHelp/comments/3vgc67/enforcing_the_rules_in_the_sidebar_aka_why_cant_i/) as to why your post has been removed.  To un-remove your post, please edit your post with the relevant information, and [message the moderators](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FMathHelp&amp;subject=Unremoval%20Request&amp;message=[Link.](https://www.reddit.com/r/MathHelp/comments/avxw8w/-/\)) with a link to your post. *Do not delete your post*. Thank you.
My main is Pathfinder I really like his passive I like  to play super slow and play the circle all sneaky-like. 
Op, please block and ignore him and focus all of your love on yourself. Work on your mental health. He doesn't deserve it after getting you pregnant and giving you an STI. I've gotten chlamydia before and I've had men like him try to trauma-bond me like that. Don't ever put the needs of others before yourself. Find somebody who is willing to invest in a healthy relationship with you. 
27. -Brian
Isn't it amazing?!?  Oh I love it.  I learned about drag when I was 14 and a coworker was a drag queen. 💙💙
the next Prez will have to hire a lot of Obama guys at the start - cause the hand off from Trump will be a no show due to incompetence (and pettiness)
Wish I had money for Platinum. 
&gt; He was definitely in the wrong but that's not typical behavior for him.  I mean, one time is too many. If I murdered one person, I assure you that's very out of character, but I would not expect it excused with "ah well, it's not typical behavior for him"  And this isn't even mentioning I'm not a cop and police, with the power of the law should be held to a higher standard. 
Yeah just do whatever makes it fun for you
yesyesyesyesyesOHFUCK
&gt; That makes him extremely easy to out maneuver.  Invite him to a closed door meeting with one of [these bad boys](https://images-na.ssl-images-amazon.com/images/I/61r-TrjQQDL._SY355_.jpg)
If you find it please send it
2 Chronicles 15:13   But that whoever would not seek the Lord, the God of Israel, should be put to death, whether young or old, man or woman. Deuteronomy 17:2-5   “If there is found among you, within any of your towns that the Lord your God is giving you, a man or woman who does what is evil in the sight of the Lord your God, in transgressing his covenant, and has gone and served other gods and worshiped them, or the sun or the moon or any of the host of heaven, which I have forbidden, and it is told you and you hear of it, then you shall inquire diligently, and if it is true and certain that such an abomination has been done in Israel, then you shall bring out to your gates that man or woman who has done this evil thing, and you shall stone that man or woman to death with stones Leviticus 20:27   “A man or a woman who is a medium or a necromancer shall surely be put to death. They shall be stoned with stones; their blood shall be upon them. Deuteronomy 17:12   The man who acts presumptuously by not obeying the priest who stands to minister there before the Lord your God, or the judge, that man shall die. So you shall purge the evil from Israel   John 3:18   Whoever believes in him is not condemned, but whoever does not believe is condemned already, because he has not believed in the name of the only Son of God.   Luke 19:27   "But those enemies of mine who did not want me to be king over them - bring them here and kill them in front of me."
Dogs, foxes. Soon to be wolves, then dingos. Probably a honey badger from there. Then easily a vulture.
Scatterbrained, flakey and people with comprehension problems. Usually, those traits are all in one person. 
I just laugh when I see this guy's face. And teeth.
I don't know how much R you know, but if you can import your data using read.table or something, it should be pretty easy with the paste function and a loop:   outputText = ""  for( i in 1:length(input[,1])){  string1 = as.character(input[i,1])  string2 = as.character(input[i,2])  paste(outputText, "Participant ", i, " is a ", string1, " year old ", string2, ".\n", sep = "")  }
Interesting piece of info for you, FoxNews doesn't represent the opinions of all conservatives in the country. I know, it's hard to believe but it's true. 
Lots of linemen too
Proving more that Isles fans are pathetic and classless. 
I'm guessing that for these new brews, they're reimagining the food spoilage meter as a "fermentation" meter; and instead of the drinks turning into a useless spoiled version once the meter runs out, they're upgraded to their fermented version. 
That moment when post rework mining money making methods are equal/ less effective than pre-rework, but caused a loss of profitibilty to PvM sources.  - Trah harmonised runite was much better than animica currently is - concentrated sandstone with perfect mining potion was similar profitability as animica without the need for loads of questing and effort to get a an Earth and Song pick for perks, since a dragon pick with perks was still reasonably useful.  And a huge number of bosses are negatively affected by replacing ores with stone spirits.   Personally, the M&amp;S was fine for it's changes to how the skill was trained, but the value wasn't retained. The alch value per bar used in gear should be raised , even with elder rune you only get 10k value from high alch per bar used in the process. This is very low considering you need 2 ores and a normal rune bar, so the actual values of the ores individually are pretty low, and in turn the stone spirits need to be even lower to maintain a profitability for miners, so value on individual ores and stone spirits are very low.
She can drive a stick so she should move to Europe. Solid.
Yes. John Astin is hilarious, and Carolyn Jones is smokin'.  It's a shame it only went for 2 seasons.
He's good at everything. Even scores headers and not too weak physically. 
/sarcasm
yeah, I need to find a place where I can feel the difference. You know anything about the Athlean Blox?
They also have to be careful about what they they tell their members to do, verses what their members may spontaneously decide to do. PSAC can encourage members who are not working that day, or are on lunch etc to come out to the rally - but they (the union leadership) can't encourage members to walk and join (that crosses the line into an illegal strike and they can be fined for it), but if there's a large rally and people decide to leave work to join in, or walk on their own then the union itself is still in a legal position. 
You're not getting anything for it, especially with the damage on it. Let the impound guy sell it and be done with it. I know it's a good car and I know why you like it, but financially you're fucking yourself which is more important. Don't let the fees keep stacking up, just let it go and buy something else. Eventually you'll have the money to buy another land yacht, but now isn't the time. 
God I want him banned
I like to guess if its antijokes, or antiantijokes everytime I read a joke.
That’s a whole lot Macklemore than I expected. 
The entire comment section of /r/gonewild?
People: Calm the F down! that's just an ordinary Shoebill MURDERBIRD. IT FEEDS ON HUMAN SOULS! ...And big fish like lungfish, eels, and catfish (not an actual cat), and also crazy stuff like Nile monitor lizards, snakes, and baby crocodiles. The ush...
SK isn’t going to be sitting there while artillery rains down on them. they will be fighting back and I’m sure have planned out several strategic moves. And mines and other roadside bombs did a lot of damage to us in Afghanistan- it doesn’t seem to be something that can be easily swept away.  Regardless of what NK does - it will cause a lot of damage and death but in the end it is a limited power that will be crushed if push comes to shove.  (As long as we somehow get China to go along) 
Gotta love this game
I read the PULL thread for some reason(night shifts yay) and im pretty sure smoke_herbs is this person  https://prettyuglylittleliar.net/profile/48855-sakuto/  Cause he's the one who donates, and smoke always has the fresh clips and is obsessed with her
Hotfix means nothing about server side or client side. 
Yeah, conservative households only serve to instill fear of coming out, really. Preferences will come naturally, no matter how much fear is there, or how conservative one’s beliefs are.
“Of course,” she agreed looking down at her stance unsure of what to do next.  It was easy to ignore Edmyn looks. Rhea pretended to be more interested in getting the moves right though she was sure her face gave it all away. And up until this point, it hadn’t been *too* awkward, but she had forgotten about the hand holding. It was such a short part of the dance yet now it seemed to dominate her thoughts.  Reaching out, she placed her hand on Edmyn’s shoulder as instructed. Rhea could feel the tension in his shoulders and tried her best to keep her touch light. When she went to clasps hands with the Plumm, she stopped short.   “Is this the dance where we switch partners after the turn or is that the one after the King’s first dance?’  She was hoping to pass over the hand holding until they became more familiar with one another. It was one thing to do it with a group of others around them but alone was something entirely different.  *But were we alone in the Reach last time we danced,* she thought before banishing the thought from her mind.
How about have your parents pay?
Im  SHonK
Every fighter gets the roster leaked shit can't be easy to keep the lid on
I just reached level 100 on Xbox and none of my games have crashed. Lucky I guess.
You could watch the 1932 Scarface!
Sadly I am an american. Thats so weird why though?
I'm afraid their mentality goes deeper than that
I mean in terms of raw destructive output, Megalith wins. Its ability to knock asteroids out of orbit to impact on any target on the planet is basically a way to bring about an extinction-level event on demand. Plus, any missiles in the silos can be fitted with nuclear warheads.  Stonehenge is a railgun array that can shoot down asteroids and planes, so it really serves better as a deterrent/defensive weapon, while Megalith would be a better strategic weapon.
The post befor was literally shit so thx 
Then those billion dollar sports teams shouldn't be crying for publicly funded stadiums as if they're public entities for public good  Having the attitude that we should merely accept things that suck is cowardice
Give my that beautiful ass! God I would love to fuck you right now 😍
Do you people read or just type shit out? 
Usually artists that release records for Record Store day don’t sell them using big corporations, so they’ll probably only be available at your local independent record store :)
is there a tao link for the gucci pants, not the side stripe one. [http://3125tiger.x.yupoo.com/albums/64377249?uid=1](http://3125tiger.x.yupoo.com/albums/64377249?uid=1) 
There probably were some hidden away in the stacks of cash
Holy crap, nice work. I was just going to let two others piggyback on what I did, but you've made this a real effort!
It's really not that hard to find..
I'm not saying Human Rights Watch or Amnesty International are wrong. I'm saying Corbyn *is*. This man refers to Hamas a 'friends' but then has the nerve to condemn Israel for defending its borders. Because let's be honest, whether or not it was right to use such force, no other country would have behaved any differently. None would tolerate a violent riot of foreign nationals trying to attack its border. I mean, the US deployed the army to the border just to stop a caravan of migrants. The UK deployed the army in Northern Ireland numerous times during the Troubles and was equally, if not more so, violent. This is what we call the ‘new antisemitism’ theory; people hold Israel to an impossibly high standard compared to the other nations of the Middle East.
Was datamined. 
Can you throw something in an olympic sized swimming pool for reference?
$HVT pluses to a pretty good day!  I like those numbers.  Tomorrow is gonna be good!  I held and held!  Finally!  It’s real and it’s money.  
Lol I didn't even second guess it
Keep and “bear” arms. What do you think bear means? 
youre beautiful 😍
yeah continue please in how its any difference in toronto or boston for a regular season game in the city as opposed to Calgary. Do they have rallies, or parades or something that I didn't see when i lived there???
First Saturday in ages I'll get to watch a match because I'm not working. Hopefully it ends with us nicking 3 points from the twats. 
Why has no one linked r/AsABlackMan?
i don't really give a shit 'bout this
Thank you! That really helps my understanding of a lot this! 
I'm buying you a beer at the next game lol it'll probably be a playoff game that I go to next 
Happened to me when I have the game on 2 devices and forgot to close the app on one before starting it on another.
It wasn't one lightning-bolt thing in particular, but a good chunk of it was thinking sparked by my decade-and-a-half of being partnered with an Icelander. I lived in Reykjavik for four years, and I've been to visit my in-laws many, many times outside of that. There is a paradox that exists there, a fierce pride in their smallness and self-reliance, paired with a desire to engage more fully with the international community. One of the quickest ways to start a knock-down-drag-out fight over the dinner table is to toss out the question of whether or not they should join the EU. And the culture there has noticeably changed since I first visited in 2005, as more and more tourists pour in and more and more young folks study or move abroad.   That's not the only thing that fueled the Fleet, and culturally, Exodans are definitely not Space Icelanders, but the conflict between preserving that which makes you unique and opening yourself to the possibilities of other influences is something that I, as an outsider, have been mulling over for a while. I don't have a good answer for the central question there, either in life or in \*Spaceborn Few\*.
MEGA FAGGOT
As someone who draws those connections I'm offended.... and I completely relate with this meme :'D
Zafaras! Even if they're the best, THEY DESERVE CUTER!!!
That scene in the show Atlanta though 
I posted this earlier -- then accidentally deleted it.  Sorry!
If they made this boring ass skin to appease the “female tier 100” crowd, would that be an r/maliciouscompliance ?
I think you'd look amazing in something like this cute little [two-piece set](https://www.rebelsmarket.com/products/zippers-and-chains-faux-leather-two-piece--110539?sold_by=laticci). The skirt is short enough to make the most out of being in public with no panties; The corset top is super sexy and the zippers and chains offer endless potential for fun. Wear them with some fishnets and your favorite combat boots and you're set!  And all for less than $20!  Take the rest of your budget, add another $15 (still not too bad) and get [this cape](https://www.rebelsmarket.com/products/bw041-gothic-velvet-cape-with-tassels-lace-153801?sold_by=darkinlove) to complete the look. It's warm(ish) but see-through, it has your classic Victorian Goth velvet, your black lace, your funky design, your unique details... it's perfect. 
a new garage door is like $1200 installed in my area  the car damage however, looks a bit more difficult. 
yeah they are compatible with the joyetech BF coils just wasnt' sure if they were still being made plus you know joyetech coils lol
I know these Priests believe in a HELL, I hope every last one of them get to see it.
Thanks, i hope youre doing well and it stays well.   My stoma has shrunk a bit in the past few days l, ive had it for a month now. I think i need smaller bag sizes because its going to irritate my skin. Hopefully i can get this sorted.   A quick tip for the future. Make sure you dont change your bag after you eat as it is mostly active at that time. Also make sure you rub the adhesive A Lot so it sticks well. Plus getting all the free samples you can is great. Make sure your nurse listens to you and not the other way round. Gummy sweets like haribos and mashmellows are good to have. Drink a lot, a lot.   Thats what ive done so far. Im the kind of person to worry a lot about the smallest of things. So even though im fine i still think something is off, its hard to get fully used to it.   Im using the Salts ileostomy stoma bags with a barrier ring. It seems to work well, i just need a better size as it is a bit big now.   What brand do you use? 
That's not QoL, that's just a buff
It only bothers you if you really care about race. For me it doesn't matter if the character is black/gay/woman/whomever. He behaved like a nobel man which he is and the fact that he is black doesn't change it in one way or the other. I'm sad that he is gone just as much as I would be if any other supporting character which I like would go.
There’s a new axe-throwing place right near TR next to a really amazing brewery, Birds Fly South.  Downtown Greenville always has a lot going on.  Day trips to Asheville (which has an amaaaazing pinball place that’s so much fun!) or Charlotte are always really fun!  What type of activities are you looking for....
Perks on BoS arm?
Can I get more pics of Sage Bogo up close?
That's me after one too many gushers packs
Swerve from dropship due to mass firefight, land next to a guy with kitted spitfire, die embarrassingly 
Original post on the memes page: [https://www.facebook.com/groups/purduememes/permalink/1811731809124657/](https://www.facebook.com/groups/purduememes/permalink/1811731809124657/)  Source code: [https://github.com/kcsodetz/pov\_fan](https://github.com/kcsodetz/pov_fan)
I'm only replying to your comment because I disagree with you so much. For starters, you haven't actually listed any problems, only that you agree with pratt's position (if that is his position, I haven't checked).   There is a huge difference between a person coming out as LGBT and another stating they are anti-LGBT, the latter invalidates and/or promotes hate towards a group of people. Also there shouldn't be a second side to this, if a person is LGBT, it is their right to follow that way of life without you and others judging their community. In the same way, it's not okay to for a person to hate the church or to hate Muslims.   I have now checked and whilst the church he goes to is anti gay, Pratt has come out and stated he doesn't follow that particular aspect of his church. 
That's my guess. I'm guessing that this is sort of like an adrenaline shot to help modern more than anything. Further "horizon" like sets will have reprints of these cards or potentially others. I think this was a "we've heard you so let's do it right now and go all in" type of set
“They let you grab them by the pussy” is the actual quote moron.  
Which one? Kuroinu?
It’s the [look at all those chickens](https://youtu.be/F-X4SLhorvw) girl grown up
Love this game 
I think for stuff like this that isn't covered by a T2200, it would be claimed as a "tradespersons tool allowance" via form T777.  https://www.canada.ca/en/revenue-agency/services/tax/individuals/topics/about-your-tax-return/tax-return/completing-a-tax-return/deductions-credits-expenses/line-229-other-employment-expenses/employed-tradespersons-including-apprentice-mechanics/deduction-tools-tradespersons.html
Haha that little one smacked the “funny bone of the knee”
“...Uses her fingers to wipe her plate and then licks her fingers...”  I don’t think you even have to have misophonia to be grossed out by this. She sounds awful.
This is Chris Hansen, take a seat over there please
Thank you for posting to r/SexSells! There has been a recent **increase in scamming from unverified sellers** who will contact users through their buy ads. For your own safety, we recommend you only work with sellers who are verified on our subreddit. Moderators will be unable to help you if you work with unverified sellers.   To ensure someone is verified: Ask every seller **to comment on your thread** and check that they have Verified Seller or Trusted Seller flair before continuing. If they can't comment, they may be banned. [Message the moderators](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSexsells) with any questions about a user. **DO NOT SEND PAYMENT** until you have seen for yourself that a user is verified. A user who offers to verify for you themself on kik/cam/etc may be who they say they are, but there is no way to hold them accountable in the event that they take your payment and do not deliver services.  **Please refer to the [ban list](https://www.reddit.com/r/Sexsells/wiki/bans)** before sending a seller payment, especially if they claim to be verified but have not commented on your thread. Many of the "sellers" messaging you who will not comment are on this list.   Please **report** unverified sellers who respond to your buy ads. This is against our rules, and will result in a safer community for everyone.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Sexsells) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Lol it’s not a matter of dialect, it’s a distinct way of structuring the legal profession
WTF does that title mean?
r/sweatypalms
Yup...9% increase for me this year.
i would have agreed with this up until a point, but hephaistos's workshop.....  even with the mercenary tier perk, upgrading the engravings is *crazy* *expensive.*  i burned through 2 million in a blink and am still not "caught up" - and this is to say nothing of the ship upgrades.  still though, i care far more about the assassin damage nerf than the currency. i think people are understandably especially salty because of these two pieces of bad news were combined in a single update. 
The way you go about apologizing is going to be vital. Look up how to give an apology, and be sincere. Don’t go into it thinking you’re apologize to get a rec letter, but instead because you made a genuine mistake. 
It makes it much easier to store, and I find it pulls much easier than even ones sold with a center pull!
Still running the 920 i7, 24gb ddr3 ram and 1070.  Not building until 4k is main stream.
Which one was the original?
Reaper has a ton of variety in their catalog, you can use their figure finder to search up something that works for what you're looking for. 
Are you making sure to warm your hands up before you prick your fingers? Try doing the sides of your finger or even your arm/leg if you have callused fingers from testing too much in them. Make sure to switch locations and let those places heal up. 
"Despite making up 13% of the population..."
Well, this is known isn't it? Price was the captain with the Aussie approach, "do your fucking job", being hard nosed and stuff.  Word was that the large contingent of Island boys in the team with religious backgrounds didn't like it and its what resulted in him having the captaincy stripped.
Business.
Me: no he’s not?  You: he states 21!  Me, after given a fact: Pikachu face
PhD in what? What jobs are you looking for? What field(s)?
Huh? The kid in yellow clearly won, and it really wasn't even close....
Bangalore because bombs and smoke.
Not even gonna lie. I’m impressed. She could teach a seminar. 🥂 cheers to number 21
The stickers from you showed up today! They're great-- thanks so much!
Thank you
come on Steph...shoot well tonight
can't forget about the Mayor
Exactly, I'm very glad for the optional decision.
Hey /u/fengjiahao! Thank you for your submission!   Unfortunately it has been removed because your submission must be a link to an image or gif. Please feel free to re-submit using a direct image link (must end in jpg, gif, png, etc). Websites will not be approved as posts, unfortunately.   This is also a reminder we do not allow software gore. For various websites that do comply with our rules, **screenshots are mandatory** for things like online menus, as we don't want to deal the hug of death to small websites. Just make sure all Personal Information has been scrubbed, blocked out, blurred, etc. No names, websites, phone numbers, and so on should be visible, as we don't want to start a riot over at the local Taco Shop just because they can't put together a menu worth a damn.   Also, if your link ends in ?1 please remove that and anything else extraneous before submitting.   Thanks for understanding! Stay crappy. &lt;3   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/CrappyDesign) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Any industry that profits off the suffering of others shouldn't exist. 
&gt; I said that I was a network analyst   and I didn't immediately say 'I doubt that', now did I?  &gt; and cited my experience dealing with microwave ovens that leak emissions in excess of FCC regulations, as well as some other basic principles of microwave radiation that anyone can Google and verify.   You cited high-school physics, nothing more.  &gt; Your response was an Argument from Authority   nope, no argument from authority whatsoever. I merely told you 'I know that, dude'. Propably the same thing you would tell me if I started to explain to you the basics of how network protocols work.  &gt; You can call that insinuating that you were lying, from my perspective I'm pointing out the logical fallacy.   I call your perspective distorted. You had absolutely zero reason to doubt me, other than my opinion =/= your opinion.  &gt; And if you think that my "what are you smoking" statement was anything other than my use of a common idiom to express my disbelief, you might need to lighten up a bit.  I do not 'need to lighten up' any more than you need to learn some manners. Also, since this is going absolutely nowhere I am not going to respond any further.
Yaaaayyy! 
They close at like 2am, so no problem there.  I don't recommend breaking in. It's a pub, not a study room, but it is usually quiet enough to get work done.
Technically, after every new piece of evidence, the case has never been stronger. That's kind of the effect of acquiring more evidence.
Not a problem, no rush.
Jesus this went from interesting to oh shit to how can this get any worse to oh fuck his pants are on fire. 
I really like Mirage primarily for his personality while playing.
You should do more muffintop stuff, all that chub in some tight shorts would be amazing 😉 
now I don't have a clue about stats but winning a full premier league with a relatively pony team is not like a fluke game or a little run like some one-off anomaly, it's a repeated success over 38 matches. I think another stats head would turn around and say to win a title over 38 consecutive games with that Leicester squad means a very, very high probability that the manager did a good fucking job that year
P3D Stealth better get power bump.
I want one! Where did you get this/how did you do!?
OWE is not Dragon Gate. CIMA has apparently had a falling out with the rest of the DG crew.
The peacock feathers are awesome!!! 
yeehaw! love to see the love from chatt!
Completely True
Gonna be on a flight home, this is the first game I'm missing all season :( Hopefully someone can put in some much-needed work down low, we can get this W
It looks like you are trying to submit a link from Twitter. [Please follow Rule 5 and link directly to media.](https://www.reddit.com/r/ApexLegends_Porn/about/rules/) Use Imgur, Gfycat, or the image uploader on the Reddit mobile app to host your media. Thank you.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/ApexLegends_Porn) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You can see the pain in his eyes after realizing what he’s done. It’s sad, but karmas a bitch
Climate Change is absolutely catastrophic.   1. Climate Change is different from other apocalyptic ideas in the sense that it is currently happening, already killing people in extreme weather conditions and is backed up by scientific consensus. Our current goal of 2 degrees Celsius (maybe 1.5 degrees but no way we're gonna make it) will have and already have massive impacts on insect populations declining, ocean acidification, coral bleaching, sea levels rising, icecaps melting, scarcity of drinking water. We are looking at displacements of millions of people due to famines, wildfires, flooding etc. This is 'best case' 2 degrees warming, without possible tipping points (which could be catastrophic, but are totally unpredictable so not really useful to get into it). Currently emissions are increasing worldwide. If everyone lived like people do in the US we would be at 4 degrees warming by 2100. 2. For everyone talking about the birthrate of developing nations and their influence on global warming: the richest  7% is responsible for 50% of emissions. The poorest 50% percent of the population are responsible for 7% of emissions. Increasing the world population by 2 billion poor people will only increase emissions by 3%. On average, someone living in the US emits the same amount per year as 32 people in Nigeria. What this also means is that a relatively small amount of people can screw it up for everybody else, so even one country dropping out of these international agreements can be really impactful.  3. Yes, privileged people will probably be fine, but as opportunities/resources shrink the amount of people who actually are privileged will be a smaller percentage.   I don't think humanity will go extinct. I think humanity will, more so than it is already, be under tremendous amounts of pressure and many people will suffer. Then again, many people have suffered for the last thousands of years. Humans are adaptable and can deal with a lot. Your child will most likely suffer at some point in their life, even without climate change. Is it okay for you to bring a child into this world knowing it will suffer? How much suffering is too much? If you teach it to accept its suffering, will that make it better? I think ultimately life is not fair, suffering is inevitable and wanting to having children is often not a logical decision. A logical (ethical) decision has to be derived from some type of ethics. If you think it's ethical to reduce suffering, and not existing causes less suffering than existing, then obviously having a child is not a reasonable choice. However, if you think the value of enjoying life is worth the potential suffering, then maybe it's okay to have a child. There are so many of these arguments you can make.   I myself am a fencesitter, and I haven't decided if I will have a child or not. If yes, it will definitely only be at maximum one biological child. My main point of reference is how I feel about being alive, and currently I don't know. I have suffered quite deeply, yet I am also very privileged and my life has turned around a lot and become very enjoyable. It's all wonderful and awful at the same time.  I sometimes I try to imagine being my own child, and how I would feel being a young adult living 25 years from now. It seems like an impossible imagination. All I know is that if I choose to have a child, I have an enormous responsibility for their well being, and that means teaching them to be resilient, protecting my privilege and fighting for a world that is safe. I have to decide whether I am up for that kind of struggle. 
It’s weird to see them in other media after watching cracked for so long. They just show up. There was a shot of swaim in the crowd of one of Dave Chapelle’s new specials. 
yeah for all ppl that took days off just to lvl it sucks, i can understand the island wipes. but char wipe. lets wait for release for that
Debatable 
New T-shirt?  Picogram Strike Back
I think 'Last Man Standing'
Doesn't matter.  They went against their current objective in hopes of being converted
Throwing things from the tables  Because I used to love seeing things getting break
It’s old reddit.  r/foundthedarkmodeuser
# The Amazing Bulk II: Return of the Bulk  &gt;*The Amazing Bulk II: Return of the Bulk* is the sequel to *The Amazing Bulk* (2012). To those of you who don't know: *The Amazing Bulk* is a story about a government research scientist named Henry "Hank" Howard who has been commissioned by General Darwin to make a serum that will increase the user's strength and longevity. He wishes to marry the daughter of General Darwin, Hannah Darwin. General Darwin says no and, in an effort to prove that his serum is successful, Howard injects himself with it, allowing him to turn into a colossal purple humanoid.   &gt;   &gt;   &gt;   &gt;That's basically the beginning of the story, at least. Now, here's how *The Amazing Bulk II: Return of the Bulk* should go (WARNING! THIS CONTAINS SPOILERS FOR THE AMAZING BULK):   &gt;   &gt;It's been five years since the death of Henry "Hank" Howard. The world is full of chaos and no one is there to stop it. Hannah Darwin, the daughter of the late General Darwin, has been lonely now that her boyfriend is dead. On May 17, 2025, there is a newscast saying that the Bulk has returned. Next thing that happens is that the Bulk appears right at her door. &gt;   &gt;   &gt;   &gt;Also 75% of the money will be used to buy a bigger studio. The other 25% will be used to hire more 3d animators with at most a year of experience.  So, what do you think?
"too" early... tooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooooo early
Oh, I didn’t read the description so I assumed
Stranger missions 
I was thinking the same. It's a nice picture and Holland is a lovely country, but I don't find the picture amazing
Btw it isnt death if it was never sentient. It would be like if you just were never born, how would that be death? Also, the universe is deterministic, so it isnt like you can escape that fate, and it isnt like there was ever another option.
macedonia is greek  &amp;#x200B;
the bar for challenges said 15
I wonder if it was the episode of thw x files where the forest/tree people were killing loggers? 
Bad origin
so is your assertion that it would be okay for a neighbor of Israel to take their land by force?  don't forget that when you create case law it applies to every case.  /edit: also we should limit discussion of occupied land to that which became occupied after WWII and the development of the UN and all that came with that. There is a big difference. It is now a WAR CRIME to occupy land as a result of war once that war has ended.
Fear and loathing in sunnyvale
&gt;I don't have many male friends because, to be honest, I'm "rare" and seen as very pansy-like or feminine for understanding emotions on a deeper level. Lots of guys I know talk about women in what I view as very demeaning ways. I don't like that.   Totally makes sense. That's what my guy friend that has all female friends is sort like.  Also, can you describe those ways they talk about women? Out of curiosity. Ive heard some stuff in groups of guys when I had all male friends but I'm sure it's even worse normally, since they didn't want to get too bad with a girl there.. Honestly, the fact that men demean women so much makes me prefer the company of women, to be honest. And it makes me kinda prefer a relationship with a girl as well (I'm bi, more interested in girls to begin with.. despite the fact I've only been with guys haha).   &gt;Yeah, had a guy get angry at one of my friends for turning him down and he kept asking why, so she turned to me and said I was her boyfriend. He kept asking to see us making out to prove it, but everyone around us called him a pervert and got him to piss off.  Jesus fucking christ, I'm sorry. 
 You're the second person to say something about  Nathon Fillion. That sucks. I liked him. 
Cash for keys!  Negotiate for moving costs, too.  Buying out the rest of the lease isn't that pricey for the old/new owners (~$3600).  Your friend should offer to be out for $5000.
You’ll use this same photo in your tinder profile in 5 years from now. You’ll state that you had a “knee injury” when you meet your dates. 
For me that ended up being some sort of anxiety I wasn't even aware of. Physical/mental.
All games that I have played that have loose subreddit's rules regarding memes are a shit place. Everything is a meme, no content, just stupid memes about stupid shit they think about the game or mocking the developers.   This sub is already a joke, making it even more childish with loosen rules towards memes for the kids will just make it insufferable and make it¹ become a circlejerk sub (as if it weren't already).   edit¹: typo
Your priority list leaves out "closest," which is important when it first starts attacking him, since he's standing closer than the melee creeps when he's trying to drop aggro.
Its common enough that lightroom has a tool dedicated to spot removal :)  Dust spots are normal and hard to avoid as dust is everywhere and gets everywhere. You can minimise them by being careful (holding camera facing down when changing lens etc). They are more likely to be visible at higher f stops as well. However in still photopgraphy they are very trivial to remove. They are much harder to deal with in video. 
You are forgetting one important thing. Trust. Nuclear power is dangerous because the consequences of an accident are huge. The public has to trust the industry to do the right thing and doesn't cut corners to save time or mony.  In Fukushima the tsunami walls weren't high enough. After Fukushima we learned that there was already a tsunami that hight 150 years ago. We saw the hydrogen explosions and learned that there are measures to prevent these. Which are even mandatory in germany. And than we learnded about all the little things TEPCO did and whre the japanese authorities closed both eyes.  Now think about it. When these fuckups happen even in Japan what does that say about other countries? After Tschernobyl you could just blame the russians with low standards but Japan is a western country with high standards. In Germany we have learned that the industry tried to cover litte accidents. Or didn't adhered to the regulations.   Then you see the problems with the new [EPR](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/EPR_(nuclear_reactor\) ). Failed schedules and raising costs. Costs so high that renewables are easily cheaper.  And of course the problem with the nuclear waste. Name me one western country which has a solution to store it for the next 100.000 years.
Yeah that's pretty obvious they don't want people that are different than them
Ah, understood. I was obviously thinking regarding the player value, not the pick. Thanks for clarifying.
Your wish is my command. 
Wraith because I really like her passive ability as well as her main ability because it allows me to escape from a fight quickly and easily.
This actually really helps, I know that she won’t be able to hide the smoking because of the times when she smokes etc, but that doesn’t stop me from walking away, which stupidly I’ve never thought of doing.  Like even while writing this in my head I’m debating compromises and stuff to still smoke while still not doing it chronically but I know ultimately that’s not what I want. I don’t want all the negative neurological and psychological effects of weed and I want more money Thanks a heap! 
Have you ever seriously eaten a stir-fry without bean sprouts and been like "Oh man, you know what this needs?  Some flavorless bullshit"
I prefer no belt between these photos! But the belt does seem a little low in the belt photo, so maybe I'd like it better if it were right at your waist.
yayayaya
I don't even turn my tv on anymore.  Once outs set up your golden.  I'm thinking of moving my playstation father from the tv so I have a better angle and just run a long internet cable.  
Bloodhound, because I like seeing the footsteps of everyone who's been there, and the ult is great.
I was wondering where the Squirtle was, but then I found it on the TV! Very nice touch!
I believe it's where D.O. Originated from, so really not surprising. 
I don't know if I'd compare Warframe to MHW, as I enjoy Monster Hunter but find Warframe boring as all get out, but they both have a steep learning curve that can be off-putting. I personally don't like the feel of movement and gunplay in Warframe, so I got bored and stopped playing. 
Can you bestow the sauces sir?
Am I right in the observation that Shelties have more of a differentiation between the skull and the snout, when compared to the Collie? Doesn't the 'look' of the Collie include the clean line from the crown to nose?
Touchdowns. Football term I think 
[https://soundcloud.com/jacob-evans-57/songschicago05-all-of-you-in-your-darknesses-alone](https://soundcloud.com/jacob-evans-57/songschicago05-all-of-you-in-your-darknesses-alone)
UwU
Yeah? What new info was revealed through his testimony?
*force buys ump+ armour for 8 rounds*
Man Ranieri should be given some kind of job at Leicester 
The grey one? There's some text around each head. I don't know if this is something she commissioned or if it was for a popular group. Just looking for anything I can find right now.
Sooooo jealous.
If you haven't seen any of these in a live game have you \*actually\* been playing?
1. Hunter X Hunter 2011 2. One Punch Man 3. Nichijou 4. K-on 5. Attack on Titan  I'm aware that I'm pretty fking casual X)
Completely Agree!
He’s not wrong though...
I mean, he's probably right, since the next movie is just going to undo most everything in Infinity War anyway through some time paradox nonsense.  In fact, we already KNOW Spider-Man is still alive, he has a new movie coming out soon.
Did they say they’re removing it?
Nelson has been off IR for almost 2 weeks, he's just the designated press box guy now.
Got a Vampire's Explosive Black Powder Pistol. Any interest in that?
[Phillie Phanatic is so happy!!!!!!!!!!!!!](https://bloximages.chicago2.vip.townnews.com/delcotimes.com/content/tncms/assets/v3/editorial/b/63/b638725e-afbb-5897-a2aa-e8e415f2f952/5b7c1653eae81.image.jpg?resize=400%2C350)  &amp;#x200B;  On the flip side though, Bryce Harper is extremely unloyal and selfless when he just got up and left the Nats. He's like "fuck you I'm not going to sign with you I need money"  &amp;#x200B;  [https://twitter.com/PhanaticMLB/status/1101226195901997056](https://twitter.com/PhanaticMLB/status/1101226195901997056)  &amp;#x200B;
You're questioning whether they are, after they hacked our election. OK, then, Russian troll.
SUBMIT TO PROJECT LACE  S U B M I T
When it comes to Uzume and him, it always works.
Nay, clothes you're willing to keep unwashed forever, so that you can huff them and relive the magic
This bot is most impressive
A lot of army’s playing downvote squad today.
was this not announced already
Have you tried playing in unlimited?
Conqueror, Triumph, and gunblade heals in team fights feel sooo goooooood.
The worst part is people want to think that looking like that is okay
Pathfinder all the way.   I just love his mobility and ability to pull people out of sticky situations. I've always liked more mobile characters so he really plays well with me  
I just don't understand why this guy was offended so badly to be asked to help. Just say no? Like? What is this? 
I suppose so.
Please see my reply to the OP on [this other thread](https://www.reddit.com/r/Meditation/comments/avt3di/what_type_of_meditation_do_you_do/).
Not huge deal but my 15,000 Aeroplan bonus from CIBC counted towards Aeroplan status.
Hello how are you ma’am 
That’s gonna be the worst teacher/student porno I’ll have seen
I don't mind lifting heavy things and usually volunteer to do so but those water bottles are a gigantic awkward pain in the ass. I have a lot of trouble carrying things due to my height/stubby arms. It seems like having longer arms and bigger hands help when trying to carry certain things.
A wordsmith, even.
Sophie is a Hoontah with just enough eyes on the inside.
What perfect titties... do you like tributes?
Im hoping its that high, or maybe a bit higher. Like if you jump STRAIGHT up you can just grab hold of the lower parts of the wall at artillery. But you can also angle out further and maybe go for a low but further jump.
Full size GMMK with Kailh Box Navy switches and Tai-Hao Miami keycaps
what's the wrap made of? 
I just shat so much water over it man you don't even know
Well, yeah, the pharmaceutical industry wouldn't be happy about it. It's hard to measure due to the amount of strains. A specialty pharmacy for it would be a good way to go though. Only problem is there's already a tech shortage and now you have a new pharmacy to have to staff.
i feel this so badly im sorry 
Nice seats! Let’s go flyers!
The point is to reflect the portion of your household expenses attributable to your adult child. If he/she were to pay for the same standard of living out of pocket, this is what (their portion) would cost. Reality is hard.  Arguing "you would have to pay for X whether or not I was here and using it" is the weak, freeloader argument.  All that said, I am VERY glad he is content to live at home - for both his financial and our family reasons!
Why does time fly like an arrow but fruit flies like bananas?
Many schools, and some workplaces, have agreements with Microsoft for discounted products 
A quick google search will tell you friend!
Agreed. She looks great. Not just for her age, but straight up great. 
 THIS. the feeling of him cuming in me turns me on so much and I love it but it kinda sucks that i get that feeling just as he’s finishing. 
Always with the scenarios. 
I love slingshotting with pathfinder!
So beautiful! I’m in love with the colors! 
Can you understand the morality of an animal killing another out of no apparent reason from our perspective. And advanced lf would surely have a set of rules we couldn't comprehend
Sub 171 like 10 https://youtu.be/aD-2IFy3QV4
I dont get it
They find out he's retarded 
Thank you so much for your in depth response! I truly appreciate it!   I also heard from some UCSF students who said UCSD‘s courses with the med students doesn’t provide much benefits.  Based on your experiences with UCSD grad, do you think UCSD prepares its students for residency?   Yeah you’re right about the break. UCSF’s 3 year program has a 4 week break in-between P1 and P2 year. However, when I brought up this potential issue to the dean, he responded with saying internships should be done concurrently with course work. I’m not sure how heavy the coursework will be, so I’m a bit worried about that.   As for residency, I’m sure I want to pursue residency, but uncertain of which specialty to pursue. Right now, I am interested in ambulatory care and oncology. I’m hoping my rotations will help me make a decision!   I was not sure how much of an impact the name of the school has on residency. So I wanted to see how others thought about that.   Thank you for your insight! 
No surprise they hate Tulsi:   https://gabbard.house.gov/news/press-releases/gabbard-s-securing-america-s-elections-act-earns-support-common-cause
Wraith because I like dropping portals to either troll/save my squad. Also praying to god someday I get an enemy killed with it somehow.
**Far Cry: Classic** has 22 trophies: 5 bronze, 9 silver, 7 gold, and a platinum  Its trophies are **easy**, take **12 - 20 hours** to complete, and require **2 playthroughs**  *****  [Trophy&amp;nbsp;list](https://www.psntrophywiki.org/wiki/Game/farcry-classic?utm_source=reddit&amp;utm_medium=bot&amp;utm_term=Far+Cry%3A+New+Dawn) | [PS3T&amp;nbsp;guide](https://www.playstationtrophies.org/game/far-cry-classic/guide/) | [PS&amp;nbsp;Store&amp;nbsp;(NA)](https://store.playstation.com/en-us/product/UP0001-NPUB30737_00-FARCRYPS30000001) | *I&amp;nbsp;am&amp;nbsp;a&amp;nbsp;bot.&amp;nbsp;[More&amp;nbsp;info&amp;nbsp;about&amp;nbsp;me](https://www.reddit.com/r/PSNTrophyBot/comments/7gx98k/what_is_psntrophybot/)*
Can it be?....METAL GEAR!?!?
Well we aint trying to give  much for free
Thanks I've studied alot of control systems ogata especially but now I'm surrounding myself with well the more basic stuff nearly such as PLC, do you know any other books around automation/manufacturing environment per say?
Too busy trying to discredit Cohen.
I find this particularly ironic since the good doctor in the photo screwed me just this morning with some questions on his midterm.  How terribly hypocritical!  ...but really, I know the guy and am inclined to guess that the photo may be easily misinterpreted.  Please don't break out the torches and pitchforks and march on his office.
Yeah, fuck this clown http://mlb.nbcsports.com/2018/07/11/bud-norris-is-mercilessly-riding-and-badgering-cardinals-pitcher-jordan-hicks/  The fuck you doing signing this prick, Ross?
I'm asking you to counter here with another theory- you ain't got one, do ya?  You're doing things that were crossed off the board as options during High School speech classes because they were ineffective and pathetic attempts to argue. Just... stop with that.  If you're a troll, you need practice, and if you aren't, you might want to learn how to disagree based on arguments instead of throwing a big bowl of Fox News Word Salad in my general direction.
I’m gonna get a Rex and David’s muzzle and that’ll probably be it until I buy an xl chance for the memes
You got 64, 48, 38, 22, 44
No it’s Tuton the Titan 
Yeah, a democratic workplace that organizes profits according to social agreement would be incomprehensibly self-destructive. /sarcasm  You realize even under a true socialist business you could simply democratically decide on hiring a leader(CEO) for a higher pay as if you're bidding for the best person.   How is it illogical to stop allowing outside investors to siphon from a business in a way that gives slim to no incentive to give empowering wages to those at the bottom?  For fuck's sake, this whole anti-"socialism" movement has no fucking comprehension of the meaning of the term. Aren't we supposed to support the freedom of democracy? Why allow businesses to manifest as dictatorships? You end up with corporate feudalism.
Who will drive our ubers and careems if it wasn't for engineering graduates! 
Kappy, Dermott, Naz, Gards... 😭
If you want to start a compost bin, I can provide you with red wriggles. I compost on my balcony, and even indoors in winter, without issue. 
Thanks everyone for your comments. Must be a glitch in their system today.  I'm very new to Microsoft Rewards and am pleasantly surprised at how fast the points add up. A great reward system.
It Streams to your Xbox. So yes your PC has to stay on. 
\- still white crap in GM1 strongholds  \- still lackluster inscriptions like +2%dmg or +3% ammo pickup  \- still abysmal droprates  &amp;#x200B;  \- fail -
Didn't Matthews do that or was that just a response to  Kane?
She's clearly intended to be an antagonist until the third act. The problem is most of us still see her as one. 
I go Pathfinder, Wraith, and Bloodhound.   Abilities are fun and as much as I like grappling I don’t last long enough to make me hate whoever I’m playing. 
Like the Blues Brothers car crash bit
looks sideways to me! Wall grass?
My point was they’re infinitely better since Crowder joined, where as they’re improvement was none existent before that, minimal at best. You’d expect players like Slasher etc have enough knowledge on call of duty to fix their problems in some manner.  Seems like die hard 100T fans are just as sensitive as the people they called out for being the same over the years lol 
Wrong empire bro
Can't say I disagree.
I think downhill HGH would be pretty helpful. Top skiers are gigantic. Blood doping not so much at that level.
I have to apologize for my first ever character...   This was around One Tamriel before homestead released. I was a Dunmer sorcerer healer, I had looked up builds to try and follow but the thing is - I didn't actually know HOW to heal. I remember doing fungal grotto 1 through the activity finder and not knowing how to actually use my skills, I think I just spammed combat prayer because I didn't have the twilight matriarch yet and I didn't really understand heal over times or aoe heals, positioning, etc. lol!   Thankfully it was an easy dungeon and while the dps died a few times it wasn't a big deal cause, yknow, FG1 and all but I still cringe at that old character (I deleted them quickly after due to embarassement and made a Templar instead)
Someone just did exactly that last month.
Probably James Harden and Giannis. Every year people are asking whether Harden can shake his playoff demon and especially considering Houston is probably the greatest opponent to GS thats true now more than ever. And for Giannis it will be a point where people are asking if he can really prove himself and cement himself as one of the league's most dominant player
Also, This is only on one map all my others work.
Let me tell you about MGTOW in one sentence:  “Thanks, I hate it.”
This is at least a signal that Trumps political capital will only go so far. I'm not exactly holding my breath. But we can hope this fever breaks soon. 
What billionaire?
Campaign is lame who wants to play with themselves againdt easy ass ai? Its call of duty... Its built for MP.
I actually wish the government wasnt part of marriage at all because the government sucks at fucking *everything*.  I mostly just think it makes sense for kids to share the same last name as both parents. My sister and I have different biological fathers and growing up I found it embarrassing to explain why we had different last names. Its stability for the children too. 
I'm genuinely not offering judgment either way, here, but is there a particular reason why you do this?  I'm curious.
Yeaaa most of these things I have or have had and stopped using because why pay someone else $25 to walk my dog when I can do it myself. 
Their*
Clever girl
I do it with Gusion all the time especially after earlygame 
Lmfao dude this was by far the best podcast to date. Say what you will about Alex but dudes entertaining af. Haha
No problem, I guess this subreddit is still relatively young yet. 
A foreclosure or fixer-upper will not be friendly to your wallet -- it will cost far more to fix up than you can imagine right now. A flip house is a terrible idea for your first purchase. I did it when I was young but only because I have family in the construction trades and it was a shared investment kind of deal. Even then I still went over budget mostly because I didn't know what the hell I was doing. If you are already working a job and have a weekend gig how can you work on the house?  The house will already be your every night, every weekend kind of gig, and it can take YEARS to get through everything if it is just you tinkering around and scrimping for parts and scraps.   My advice is to buy the BEST property you can possibly afford. If that means saving more money for a year or two so you can buy a BETTER property (not a falling down dump that is 100 years old) then that will be two years well spent and a much easier future for you. 
We dont know anything as of yet
I knew people were judging me!!! I get really self conscious when I try to pull into a parking spot with because I'm always crooked. It was okay it my little Mazda because it was tiny but I can't do that in a truck with out being a total ass
Politics
I work at the Coliseum and all I can say is thank god I’m off tonight 
They shouldnt be asking for feelings in the matter. It is purely to see if they are meeting any financial obligations-allegedly. I am curious as to the whole proceedings and all the junk said about me to the organization that I am not privy to. 
https://study.uwa.edu.au/how-to-apply/entry-requirements/international-and-overseas-qualifications/GCE-A-Levels  One of my teachers’ child also did not fare that well in A Levels (class of 2017) so she took a gap year too and went to UWA to do 3 + 3 Bachelor in Biomedical Science follower by Postgraduate Medicine! Most of these universities start in Jan-Feb period, so after you apply, there will be interviews (at least for UWA, some do not need). You can PM me for more details! :)
They lift and throw feces, that's pretty CrossFit my man
Yucky 
Wow I think we’ve all gotta be ashamed for looking past the Christmas album... lol
Favors or crowder tonight?
I just read the first couple of sentences and the title my bad.
Crunchy sessae sweetness YES!
My barbarian thinks in the moment, can act on instinct, track animals, start fires in damp weather, and even tell when someone is lying to him.   &amp;#x200B;  But he can't recall history or facts to save his life, or convince anyone to do anything they don't want to do.
True, I'm in another high cost of living city now and I've seriously thought of going to Alabama or something to buy a car 
yeah being high while watching this, not a good idea.
[Disbanding departments](http://www.themunicipal.com/2018/12/disbanding-police-departments-a-rising-trend/) is most certainly a thing.  For lack of resources, corruption etc. it is certainly fairly commonplace and wholly doable.
Your doctor might be able to help with a referral, I am in the US so I dont know how it works in other places, but my general doctor was able to recommend someone to me that works in the same clinic. In the past I also just googled counselors and read their web pages until I found one that sounded nice. I have done medication for anxiety as well as therapy, and they both have their strong points, I like therapy a little better because I was able to start recognizing my thought patterns related to anxiety and work on minimizing them, but medication can be a big help in the beginning to get that all under control so you can focus on your thought patterns. 
Yes it is.
Based on the logos from the newly announced Pokemon games Sword and Shield, which take place in the Galar region that looks like the series' version of the UK  No Pokemon North Ireland yet though which is nice
Yet, that's exactly what OP was hoping for. Why is his comment receiving upvotes?
For a second I thought the wall literally had that text printed on to it.
ICE picks you, Fupachu!
He’s Joey Cooole!
it usually only takes a few weeks to heal on its own. I think what he meant by that metaphor is that the crucial element of his job is not operating correctly and if he continues using it, it will only get worse. by the time they play SA, five weeks will have passed since the cancelled phoenix show. I’m sure he’s resting his voice as much as he can so should be fine  ~ lmao I got downvoted but he literally just [tweeted that he’s fine](https://twitter.com/olobersyko/status/1101528333915959296?s=21)
I see plenty of shit I don't care for when I'm whacking off. It's super easy to just not give a fuck about it and carry on.  I'll message the mods and maybe try to help them make tags, because this sub could seriously benefit from it.
There’s nothing wrong with that!   I’m in my happiest, healthiest relationship ever and there’s been 0 pegging. I play with his prostate all the timeeeeee but that’s just because it’s so fun to watch him squirm. He makes the cutest sounds.
I heard about that idea of a "service" that anybody could use, and it was a pretty good idea.  As I understand it, to prevent someone from just looking everybody up (violation of privacy), the buyer would have to initialize the check by going online and obtaining a one-time token that he gave to the seller where the seller would run the background check on the token itself.  I think it was shot down by the government.  But of course if you logged every transaction you would have a registry, but not really of gun sales but of interested buyers.  But still, why a registry to enforce universal background checks?  For enforcement?  Do meth dealers have a registry that we use to catch them? Or speeders? Seems all you need to enforce UBC is to run occasional sting operations on sellers, which is pretty basic law enforcement.
Sick 
agh.. so this thing didnt die yet *sigh*  im glad i didnt see it again here or anywhere else neither i want to see it ever again in my life, once in my life and anxiety attack was more than enough, i can imagine that some went through even worse, aka innocent lives lost  i dont usually get scared from blood, gore, i love horror, mystery and as from what someone mentioned ito junjis work, i love his mangas and work honestly and it doesnt scare me but momo TERRIFIES me more than anything else
So there is no way to advocate for treating people kindly regardless of skin if you’re a Caucasian? In fact, the only option is for Caucasians to just take the racism? I think we’re two people trying to be good and make the world a better place, but I’m going to disagree. I know you’re coming from a good place and I hope you don’t take offense to my disagreement.  I’m ethnically Jewish, and I suppose “white passing”, but my wife is white. I don’t want her to experience racism ever or be passed over on jobs she’s most qualified for per your example. Same goes for any future kids we might have who will undoubtedly look Caucasian. 
Three of them!?!?
You sound like every Lakers fan this past summer.
okay this is epic
&gt;The captain is clearly not drunk  *OP posts source proving captain was in fact drunk*  You should make sure you know what you’re talking about before you comment. It’s people like you that spread blatantly false info because they think they know everything.   And people believe you because you almost seem like you do know what you’re talking about.   But in reality, you don’t. 
Exactly my thoughts. I’m born and raised in Texas, and the confederate flag was offensive to me and my family when I was in HS 20 years ago.
Dogs don’t always need to be busy and jumping around.  Mine usually just sleep through the afternoon.  Each breed is different.  If anyone asked me to get rid of my dogs I’d tell them they can leave.
It's child PewDiePie. Have you not seen spiky hair young PewDiePie?
It collapses. Especially if after you turn 21 you magically disappear
Not fun fact: Chickens are not alarm clucks
Your going to need more light.  
when something is moving it HAS kinetic energy. it doesn’t create kinetic energy. If you’re idea is the put a turbine on the orbit of the earth to capture this kinetic energy, then the earths orbit will get closer to the Sun... and we’d burn up pretty quick. also, NO, this is not the right place for this question. try r/dimensionaljumping 
Have you not heard of the things trump did in response to them helping him win the election? Do you even follow the news and all the things that are coming out? Or is it just fake news? History will be written by those with better hindsight than we have now. The books will not be kind to trump. 
There’s 9 spots left, 6 are DLC, and 2 of them are almost confirmed to be Milena and Shinnok. So unless he’s the last spot or he’s DLC, he’s not in.
I just fixed it :) 
u/F8RGE could we get this sometime?
Was literally about to complain because I haven’t got any confirmation email or shipped email but my item popped up today lmao 
boy that's jesus
Yeah, I agree, but if there’s a nice one I mean 
And that's gay because you're touching a dick. 
Tear it down and give this kid the biggest atomic wedgie. 
why no one is talking about the things that krone left for the kids
Maybe that's why the Summit didn't go so well? Who would do such a thing during the Summit? CIA?
"I cant get used to having a woman on the bridge"
If they have expenses, then those aren’t all profits, correct?
someone post this to furry irl
were do you actually claim them or are they auto dropped into your account? 
Yooooo, can I get some commissioned?
&gt; I pointed out that painting was part of the landlord's upkeep responsibilities  In most states a fresh coat of paint is included under "normal wear and tear" so it should not only be painted before you move in, but also expected that it will be painted when you leave.  I know the apartment I'm staying at now always does it, whether needed or not, just because they're familiar enough with the law to know they should just do it to prevent problems.  It's also worth mentioning that this place is gigantic, and they have a ton of similar properties.
Pretty expensive
You meant the Mr. Huawei situation?
http://niburu.co/  Ik weet niet of er echt een flat earth community is in Nederland, maar als het er is dan hebben deze wappies er vast iets mee te maken 
I didn't even think they still did phone interviews. That's cool though. I'm just wanted to make sure a change of scenery was still possible lol
Lol. And, she got a swirly. Bitches are [crazy](https://yespornplease.com/view/190572047).
Yeah but I’m not complaining. Our teacher showed us his stocks from 2000. He lost $400 on some stereo company that went downhill. But I guess he gained $12000 on Apple which is cool.   It’s just a game with fake money, so I guess if we fail hard it’s a learning experience
It was a warning from the manufacture designed by electrical engineers. I wouldn’t want to jump to the conclusion that they were ignorant in their own design but maybe they didn’t have a protector circuit to prevent exploding. and the system was installed before the Samsung thing. Also I know NFPA requires sealed lead acid batteries or nickel cadmium. But I didn’t look to see if it changed in the new code because they made ALOT of changes, good changes. 
so hauntingly beautiful. 
Ensnaring Bridge-Builder, Stacksmoker, Stasisman, The Voidboy, and everyone’s favorite, Keeper of the Lantern?
I've known people who kept one or two chickens inside as therapy animals... But 60!?
Are you sure you're able to switch Sephora to Amazon or any others?  Just did this and the bitmo app said cannot exchange because of it being a promo card.  What the heck am I gonna do with $5 gift card to sephora lol?
F
Cheat engines and trainers are free. Wink wink
Not that good of evidence
The ultralite? I have that one still. weighs 16 oz, and gives a massive 3/4" of thickness.
Wow TIL there's cunts of every flavor 
I'm very glad to do it
I actually met her once at a bar when on a trip to LA. She didn't do anything wrong but had a very entitled attitude. I knew better than to take pictures (plus I'm too shy anyway.) 
whenever this happens I just go into solo showdown and hide until 5th place. i'm ashamed, but i ain't dropping 8 trophies
Totally Agree!
Hot mom inside it looks like it’s hot inside mom😁 You have a beautiful pussy that I bet tastes as good as it looks 
He's one of the most intelligent footballers around, rarely takes the expected road. Ozil's playing is so silky-smooth too, it's like watching someone of Messi's genius playing football. Ozil is definitely one of the standout talents of his generation, even if some people seem hell bent on trying to ruin his reputation (Uli Hoeness comes to mind). I really wish he would change his mind and play for Germany again, I'm going to miss him. It's a very different team without him.
and then Dipoto's other account pick's Trout up for the M's right?
I main Wrath! I love her character design and her ulti as well. Rifting is always a fun meme lol
You need to step away from r/politics, go outside, interact with the world...we are closing in on two and a half years of the four years and the world is doing just fine
an undead rogue.
"Neither do I...but that's prolly because I spend a lot of time on the roof than anything else."
Thank you for contributing to r/HauntingOfHillHouse! Unfortunately, your post has been removed because it is missing a title tag, or the title tag is formatted improperly. Please repost with one of the following tags at the **front** of your post title: [S1 SPOILERS], [S2 SPOILERS] or [SAFE] (for non-spoiler posts).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/HauntingOfHillHouse) if you have any questions or concerns.*
I sure hope so. 
Any reasonably healthy human adult should be able to lift 40 pounds. Its literally a job requirement for a lot of minimum wage jobs I've seen
You did good. You talked to him.   It's over now. Relax. You are too jealous. Too paranoid. 
Where does it show that person has Thorn?
Yep that's the route/time I'm going to do. Several people have mentioned to take the train over the bus because it's such a lovely journey ! Can I buy the train ticket online ? Though it's not a biggie to get it the day before, I should have time and it looks like the train station is pretty close by well Mostar looks quite small anyway. I'm always early when it comes to transport cause I panic I'm going to miss out haha. I book busses etc months in advance just to make sure I have it sorted. I struggle to be one of those last minute no solid plan travelers !
I wouldn't replace him but if I was forced to I'd probably pick Elton John
was Combat Cargo Officer on an LHD.  My buddy, the AuxO (Auxiliaries Officer) described Marine berthing as smelling like a fan room......feet, ass, and nuts!!!
7-0 them please 
Frisk looks so cute here!
Iggy is the perfect #8/9 hitter in a deep lineup that needs help defensively. Thought he might have made sense for the Cubs if they moved on from Russell.
Socialism in Russia massively transcends the Bolsheviks, it's very reductionist to say that Lenin and the Bolsheviks alone represented the movement there historically when socialist and anarchist movements and organisations existed long before them.
So in a way, is it like the precolumbian Book of the Dead?   Normal person here
Is this true? Man, fuck that shit. Disney and its shitty directors fucked up star wars for ever. Not only the sequel, but also they messed up the canon. I am so confused, that I don't know anymore which star wars fact I know is Canon or legend.
Spend $2.00 at the drugstore on a manual one and leave it out.   "Sure - here you go." 
Nice work! That takes courage and not many people would be able to do it. You look beautiful!
En gång har jag varit med om en lika jävlig vinter i Sverige. Det gick inte ens att komma loss från parkeringsrutan utan att först skyffla bort snön under bilen som hade BLÅST dit. Först då sjönk bilen ned så att hjulen fick ordentlig kontakt. 
Nah man, it's your choice and your choice alone. The facts about the way we treat animals in our food supply are clear and totally independent of anything to do with PETA. Don't put your decisions on them.
I wish you the best of luck!! I keep telling myself if I don't get them out, then I'll be in a lot of pain in the future. 
Ah I see a fellow m0xy sub 5Head.  Your Brain is running well above average speed level and you had it all figured out before he could even think of it.
Which one is your favorite?
You're right, its not a joke...jokes are funny
I'm basically the German without any good qualities, so that seems like a good choice.   Also, *god damn* is that a lot of writing, props for coming up with all that.
Good response (seriously).  That's insensitive as fuck, maybe even unconsciously cruel.  But there's a saying that goes something like, "Never attribute an action to more complex motivations that could be explained by stupidity".  Something like that - the upshot being maybe SO was acting out of sheer stupidity.  Still...not cool.  And hurtful.
&gt;Its within trump's authority to launch nukes too, got any other trash logic  The irony levels are over 9000!  Go back to /r/politics
Hi Andrew, I'm not sure if you're still answering questions, but if you have the time was wondering (relating to blockchain voting and ranked voting):  Do you see any potential for overhauling out tax system along with the voting system, such as attaching taxes to voted smart contracts for proposed legislation on a public blockchain? As in getting proposals to Congress to be considered for bills.   I'm not that smart lol, but I'd describe it as a smart contract mini-representative of sorts that people involved with would pledge taxes to or something, and then be able to take real-time Q&amp;A's and propose edits before it's a final draft proposal. The blockchain could record all of the progression as points are upvoted. 
What the hell did I just watch
Hmm, okay thanks. 
&gt; But rent controls should also stabilize property values across the board  Over time rent control actually creates it's own share of instability. While rents will plunder along with city dictated rent increase amounts (this is where rent control leads to), the units that do become available become wildly speculative. Larger corporations that know how to twist a buck will buy up the properties and run the buildings like prisons. Tenants will be booted on single lease violations. Its a much tougher environment to live in. Been there done that. 
Oh no...
There's a turtle.
I forgot to add  - I am going to take out the 2tb hdd out of my potato build and stick it in this one.
What I also found offensive was the concept that assimilation was portrayed as a good thing. AND it was based on the amount of interracial relationships - Success means being the white man's bitch. i.e. You're doing **well** as an Asian American Woman because other races want to fuck you as soon as legally possible. And it's young and old men alike, so you must really be popular! /s  "Poor Asian American men.  If only they could also be targeted by white people like me!"  This is possibly the stupidest interpretation of the statistics I've seen.  How fucking colonized do you have to be to see statistics like this as a good thing?  This is a "popularity" contest you don't WANT to win.
Paied him Got the code and confirm it works. Thank man appreciate it.
I feel like only miku has brakes at this point, and it’s doesn’t seem to be working in her favor.
Wanting to go to heaven?
Fair point, it is just that I have always been playing on a PC and when I tried to play a shooter on a frieds console, I found it weird how can someone get good at playing fps on console, the controller is just not for me when it comes to this type of games. But yeah, I also got a competent PC just now when I'm 18. Used to play on a piece of garbage for like 10 years. It only really ran Team Fortress 2 lol :D
That looks like a different coat but I'm sure its just a redesign.
Cute how you keep calling me a troll, whenever your the one who went to my profile first and stalked it, then chose to comment.   It shows how illogical and emotional you are bc you tried to bring something personal up that has nothing to do with the argument.   The worlds average temperature has been rising steadily for the past thousands of years. It's all in the geology.   Also because of plate tectonics, the climate around the world has been changing significantly over time. Sea level has been changing also, and it isn't even directly related to temperature, but more related to the convergent and divergent boundaries.   This is probably a little too complicated for a simpleton like you who just calls everyone trolls. Better go study with your hominid classmates before I give you a headache from learning. Lmao
A high end gpu is more than that 😳. You can build something for 5-700, but it's not high end. 
guys i had this exact image in a dream like 4 month ago this is VERY scary to me 
It’s the same on iPhones. 
The poor lonely brain cell that spit out that comment
Inexperienced accounts are assumed to be either spam or trolls. If this is a legitimate post, and on topic of /r/Mashups , please [message the mods](/message/compose/?to=/r/Mashups&amp;subject=New%20submission&amp;message=Please%20approve https://www.reddit.com/r/mashups/comments/avxy6g/tom_petty_jim_morrison_learning_to_soul/), and we'll reinstate it.  Additionally, please familiarize yourself with our rules located in the sidebar.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/mashups) if you have any questions or concerns.*
She really was! Yay for early money! And I'll be sending some out Monday
Coming from PUBG, I like Bangalore a lot just from her smoke ability.  Smoke grenades are so key in PUBG!
Remember our [rules](https://www.reddit.com/r/Gamingcirclejerk/about/rules):  **Rule 2: Do NOT brigade**: *Do not vote or comment in threads you've found through /r/gamingcirclejerk*  **Rule 9: Do NOT contaminate other subs**: *Do not create fake posts on other subs only to post back here. Also, do not "lol, you should post this on r / OtherSub". It's considered interfering with their content and can also lead to brigading.*  Make it a habit of reading the rules of each subreddit you participate in.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Gamingcirclejerk) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Tim Buckley
as someone with Misophonia, i couldn't get through like 1 min
More actual questions asked and less hand wringing and grand standing.
any solution yet? we just experienced this problem today and have tried everything aside from reuploading the whole video.
Top 'o' the mornin' to ya!
Does my head in every time WHAT BADASS ROLAND!?!?!? TELL ME!!!
Maybe dad's name is avoido bc he avoids answering questions lol
I’m sure that for anyone who is just now joking Reddit, that’s a very interesting factoid
"Discharge" 
/r/woooosh 
Love Boston terriers 
My new to me North Arm Skaha 2 and ZT 0566.  Both acquired from some fine folks over at r/Knife_Swap, couldn't be happier with the results. 
Still solid in blitz without Fury, and I use them in raids for global nodes 
you can take the PA before day 1! I am starting tomorrow too for BSSD!
The first thot
“Fan the Hammer works every time!” -no one, ever. 
😭 man I shouldn't have bought my bloodied super sledge sorry only have 2.5 thanks for your time man good hunting
TOMMMAAAAYYY!!!
le Blackwater has arrived.
I have one of these. She just loooooves water. She loves to play with water in the sink, in their drinking fountain, in the bathtub, etc. I really can't think of a way to discourage her from playing  with water without her possibly associating that discouragement with actually *drinking* water. And, of course, I never want her to be afraid of drinking water so...... I just deal with it.
That IHOP is probably the worst thing in the area. Once the boomers die off, it'll have no customer base
You have a source for that?  Or is making shit up the only way you can win a debate?
Happy Scale, it’s great because it helps you see your trend so even when you have ups and downs you see the downward trend.
Oh thank you for this! I'll definitely be filing it into my ammo. 
And the Serra token can help you come back as well in match-ups like control if you can land this. The turn slower is it's biggest downside in UW and it's WW is a problem for bant, though getting this down T3 would be a beating. The biggest weaknesses this card faces are the same as worship. I think it definitely has a chance for sideboarding. 
And he “allowed” Kushner to marry his daughter. 
because a huge part of youtube's viewing demographic is ppl under 20. Especially in the past decade as more Millenial families have cut the cable cord, youtube is the primary entertainment vehicle for kids. It's only natural that there would be all kinds of child-centric channels, from sports to gaming to pranks to Disney-esque comedy skits. Some are self-created, some are parent-created, and some are produced by talent agencies/managers in LA.
Finding out there is a man behind the curtain is a high to ride
np :)
Reminds me of the relationship I have with my dad, lol. She's better off for it
Well, there's no original Paper Mario enemies, only Sicker Star enemies. CS is more in the air since CS stars here TTYD is left off.
you didn’t rape that nigga.... i kept waiting for the bad part in your story but it never came  bad aka actual rape
Tilted you something awful 
Yes!! She’s been so clumsy lately too!
Gotcha. I'm still bagholding since I'm a little salty, and the rebound is showing. It raised 10 cents after hours, and I'll jump out at $1+.
You dont say
Mats Sundin turned down a trade that would have stocked the Leafs cupboards because he didn't want to join a team half way through a season. Next season, he goes and joins a team, half way through the season. We still gave him the respect he deserved. Any Leafs fan who experienced that is kind of talking from a place of reason here...  Edit: downvote this all you want folks, your disagreement doesnt change the facts. 
Let's keep the pressure up on Foxes advertisers  https://www.mediamatters.org/research/2018/10/29/these-are-fox-news-leading-advertisers/221904
I desperately need a set of coasters and would happily give you money if you separately gave me coasters that may or may not happen to resemble the AAF team logos in a completely non-business transaction
I think in most music subreddits most people just listen to what they're familiar with. I guess people forgot Ax is a beast at house music too. I hope he does more solo sets like what you described, his personality is kinda like a swedish Diplo &amp; I'm sure his smaller sets are super fun since he can do whatever he wants. Idk if we'll get that anytime soon though since SHM is coming back (which I'm also super hyped for)
I will nut
/r/gameused  Come check us out!
*vague office job intensifies*
But were you on the Hermann car?  The Hermann car is ALWAYS fun.
Make the worst character even worse fuckin lmao.... no
That’s a cop out. Simple directives are easy and not open to interpretation.   Thou shalt not own slaves....bad example that’s not in the bible.   Unmmmmm thou shall not commit genocide....crud sorry that’s also not there.   You get my point. God could have written simple unambiguous statements to communicate his/her/it’s wishes. Didn’t. Fail. 
You sure you dont want a CZ?
Yup!
I for the life of me couldn't really think of a name for a girl, maybe Bennett? Or I could do Martine 😂
It isn't different when it is the *actual* people wearing the costumes?  Seems more like a fun 'lol' than a breach of protocol but I'm not really an "orgy guy".
Thank you so much for having taken the time to see this through. I cannot tell you how many times I have seen something and said, "I should really check into this..." and never actually DO anything. So, thank you!
Me? Seriously? I’m not the one who started out making accusations about people being condescending, whilst being totally (and obliviously) condescending myself.   He accused me of something. I replied. Mind your business. 
I'm not sure why we keep pushing Cultured BEEF over other types of potential man made proteins like EGGS or MILK. It seems like eggs which are almost cellular to begin with and milk that doesn't have any complicated texture issues would be a much easier target and eliminate a lot of animal waste as well. I'm not against cultured beef, it just seems that it is a much more difficult target, and I haven't heard any efforts on either of those two fronts.
I've never had anyone not fall in love with the show if I put on S03E04, Les Hiques. My personal favorite.
Lol. I am a slow learner personally. 
Of course. But it’s more fun to think that it’s on heroin. 
Honestly I suffer from really bad ADHD so I tend to find my self procrastinating everything and just not being able to focus on shit or anything when I’m not stoned so I’d say nah I don’t if anything it helps 
You got 26, 43, 25
7cadcff1a66b1c4af9f9c17388a9a714700686d37b3d96262b7fa17200f6bd041d3c1931ee5c640a999ef7ddc97eee374ceb678fe966e5c4bc111244daa5a735
Too bad her Brew Dog beer isn't out yet. 
epico
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZbE_CR8SXqY
Absolutely
SemiAmusingBot says: I am now installed on a VPS. reply #3 test
Translated text:  Here have this one then  i want garfield's massive six foot phallus to be rammed inside me for days until i am nothing but a pile of bruised flesh and shattered bones.   ---   ^(I am a bot created by /u/zero-nothing. Please PM him if I'm doing anything stupid! Reply to a comment with '/u/morse-bot' to call me and I will translate the comment you replied to from morse-to-text or vice versa!)
Dear god I hope so 
I'm out of the loop, how do we know studios are reading this subreddit?
&gt;Better to repair than to buy something new  This is an important point, often overlooked. We get pushed to buy more 'environment-friendly' stuff, but it's often a lot better to keep using your old stuff instead of buying a new one (because making new things requires energy and other resources, usually a lot more than the usage difference between your old stuff).
Maybe Shining Celebi so you could evolve Hippopotas to give it more HP? Hippowdon can also utilize Buff Padding to bring it up to 190 HP. If you do add in the Buff Pads you could run some Adventure Bags for thinning as well.
Only 4 retweets?
Because it looked like a tricked out Grand Prix.  https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pontiac_Grand_Prix#Sixth_generation_(1997%E2%80%932003)
My ass is pretty floppy
Burn in Hell you scumbag
You should think on placing some restaurants, spas and maybe retail lots (you could add other gameplay items so it doesn't feel like you went there just to buy a single thing, i do that sometimes) and maybe combine lot types, ex. a library and coffee shop in the same building, i think that would make lots more diverse.   I think you shouldn't be too reluctant to cheating when it comes to building and making a storyline. There are some cool items in the debug catalog, and with the help of some mods you can get the most of cheats to create good storylines for your sims.
This is a great example of why ASR is helpful at showing competent engineering, regardless of subjective impressions (subjective impressions just as important to me!). That FR has to be super obvious in practice...
https://twitter.com/alexburnsNYT/status/1101266922350567425  Tells me that he's probably running.
[/r/onewordeach says:](https://i.imgur.com/9DKYpb0.png)
Oh, got it.  The most basic option would be to use PowerPoint or something similar like Google Slides.  Or, you could use Adobe Illustrator (or the shareware alternative, Inkscape).
We can get a room somewhere
When he gets hit by the truck you can see him move his hands open and closed and his mouth beep beep in rhythm with the horn meaning he did it more than once because he knew what was going to happen when he gets hit
You’ll have to wait longer if you want lower prices. Can’t expect games that are newer on the switch to have parity with older consoles. 
Well it’s based off of the UK, which geographically is a pretty linear place 
As you've already seen by now, cryo pod in an imprinted rex for the best results. I did the snow cave solo just the other day. Bring a second cryo podded rex for the 2nd part of the cave the first rex can't fit through. Nice saddle armor and high health will definitely save you the trouble of having to heal all the time. If you're just after the artifact, i'd wait around for it to respawn a few times and put the extras on an otter (since otters can carry artifacts unlike most dinos). Then you won't have to do the cave for a very very long time.
My boy loves it
I got to like 40. I told myself that if I got to one I would make a post.  &amp;#x200B;  F.
To be fair, we don’t know if it will work the same way as it did in D1.
It’s a joke. Tracy is known for his bizarre and unique one liners. Another one like that is “dropped out of school and I make more money then the teacher do”. My favorite Tracy line is “Her pussy is wet like the ocean, I split it like Moses” and “I’m so horny I’m fucking this beat”.
It does. An away team beams down to a jungle planet. Riker gets jabbed in the leg by a thorn on a moving plant. It injects him with a parasite that is taking over his nervous system. Pulaski can't find a way to fight it initially, but later realizes that the brain chemicals generated when he's dreaming seem to fight it off if he's experiencing negative emotions. So Troi does some mojo to get him to dream about intensely negative moments. Those moments are the clips that are shown.   I dunno, I never really hated it. It's not an amazing episode, but it's not a horrible premise for a story either. It's mainly the result of a writers strike that took place that year. 
Generally very good. Prefer those brand new all display machines, scan Time is super fast on those.  Love being able to top up on the go, can then and there. No more excuses to ride without a valid ticket (but fuck people defending the old system! Having to disembark my team, walk 10 minutes to to up, to walk back and be late for work? Yeah no)  Overall no complaints at all. This is good.
Gibraltar because that shield has saved my squad and me too many times. I’m eternally grateful. 
I stayed in a very cozy cabin at the north rim, the apartment type lodging at the south rim was not so cozy..... but in between... the Grand Canyon!
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
Do you feel any different since quitting?
Beautiful art!
Hey, I didn't know NymN streamed CP on his channel.
If you can get used old ones yeah, new stuff doesn’t hold up at all. 
What is it about getting older that makes you more long winded
WTF?  Do you have no self-esteem?  No options?  He's 30 fucking years old.  He doesn't have a job.  He's sketchy as hell.  Why did you move in with him? 
10 miles is pretty far in a lot of metros, is that real close in Phoenix?
Yup!
r/thathappened  Highly doubting his doctor violated their doctor-patient confidentiality agreement 
Actually, electricity is involved, I think. The mechanical forces the fly generates by rubbing against the hairs inside the trap create an electrical impulse, which triggers ion channels in the cell membranes of cells on the inside of the leaf. This causes an efflux of water from the cells on the inner surface of the trap toward the outer surface of the trap, and the resulting change in turgidity of the outer and inner surfaces (the inner surface goes soft and the outer surface goes hard) causes the trap to be pushed closed. I don't know about other plants, since not too many plants respond to touch this way, but that's how venus fly traps work.   &amp;#x200B;
No HTTPS? Pass.
I love that plate, where did you get it
Nah, it's fine, and imo kinda fun. You grind for something, then basically order it, and wait for it like you would mail. Gives you time to take a break from either Warframe, or grinding.   Like, grinding for a warframe, then grinding to level that warframe is separated. So instead of jumping right into leveling, you can continue farming for something else, then come back and farm for levels while that cooks.   Balances things out.
source? Can't find any beat writer talking about it
Thanks. I have a RTX 2070
Se la habrá cogido de verdad?
We still have stages, DLC, gameplay for the remaining kharacters and the new gamemode to be surprises tho, still looking foward to those
I think I'll be able to handle it. Im a big boy
I hope so too. Its a game after all.
Its so fake it hurts. Real friends will be in Cali with NFG, and lets not forget Boston Manor is playing a festival in England that weekend 
In hind sight I should have taken off his true weapon, but assuming his true weapon is 30% extra damage bring to total 130% Milim gets 150% during break. I still say those two damages are close enough it won’t make a huge difference when it comes to bursting bosses. 
I saw a lot of stuff that says gays are more likely to develop aids or something like that and they have to not have sex for months before they are allowed to donate blood. I'm not that educated on the topic though can you fill me in?
You don't get it because you're just not on his wavelength you low oxygen person. Blame the 4g LTE.
Jamie O’Brien, a great surfer! He also does crazy stuff like getting towed into heavy surf on water skis or riding big inflatable animals. Google or YouTube 
You'll forget all about those tiny 1oz rounds when you feel the way a BSB feels, go for the silver bull and don't look back. You'll be moving onto kilos before you know it.  *big silver bar 
Don't care; it's still my insulin pump no matter what they think.
Two questions  What's a straw man?  How is this right wing? 
I’m trying to play rainbow six siege and it telling me to sync data but it won’t work, I think the Xbox severs are having troubleshooting problems 
No, I genuinely did think you were acting in bad faith, and I still do, and I'm annoyed at getting a lecture about how the earth is not flat.  But it's possible I'm wrong, maybe I was in a bad mood when i read your original comment and i didn't see that it was a genuine attempt to assist said dude's communication skills. I dunno. All good though, I think you understand what I am trying to say.
I'm all about that. 
The twist that the Mandarin was just an actor being used to play on America's fear of radical terrorism is actually an interesting and somewhat novel concept. The problem was the man behind the puppet was one of the most cliched villains they've had.   Killian had about as much depth to him as Kycellius from Dr Strange and it didn't help that the powers of him and his henchmen were ridiculous. In a series of films that does a surprisingly good job of justifying super powers Killian's men being indestructible and cutting through steel with fiery hands was just too much.
Hi everyone! Please make sure to **upvote** well written unpopular/controversial opinions, and **downvote** badly written opinions OR popular opinions.  Please note that we are currently removing all political opinions as part of a trial period. If your post is political and was not caught in the filter, please post it in the politics megathread at the top of the sub. Thanks!   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/unpopularopinion) if you have any questions or concerns.*
It’s really cool! Great job!
Caffeine is a diuretic 🤷🏻‍♀️
Not when everything's made up!
&gt;We were able to drill down in great detail,” continued Schiff, who said they plan to publicly release his transcript sometime in the future.  Also set up another for next week.
&gt; Senast i undersökningen av SVT utgjorde utlandsfödda 58% av dömda våldtäktsmän. Det betyder en överrepresentation på över 600% jämfört med inrikesfödda. Tar vi bort europeiska invandrare är överrepresentationen ännu större. Sedan måste det påpekas att kartläggningen inte ens nämnde andragenerationsinvandrare.   Även om vi skulle ta bort alla utomeuropeiska invandrare och få 58% färre våldtäktsmän i Sverige så skulle vi fortfarande ha högre våldtäktsfrekvens än alla våra grannländer (utan att man räknar bort deras utomeuropeiska invandrare), så det kan inte heller förklaras i helhet med invandring heller. Något mer måste det vara.
Go suck a dwang
More gas to go with your gas! We hotboxing up in here bois. 
Your post has been removed since it is missing a location tag (i.e. #NYC, #Albany, et cetera). Please submit again with a location tag. You can  review our rules [here](https://www.reddit.com/r/NYr4r/wiki/rules).  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/NYr4r) if you have any questions or concerns.*
General Krenn-obi
I love all the challenges y’all are doing that’s so creative if you ever want to do a collaborated challenge lmk!!
Life is really starting to feel like a sysiphean task, what’s the point?   Don’t get me wrong I love life, or perhaps rather the ideal of what life could be, however I’m really starting to lose any hope I have left and I’m not sure what to do. I feel lost. 
Either can I... :( 
Yeah he gets a lot of non-news news coverage.   They call it news, but it's more like gossip.   With the food thing, I just don't understand judging people by the food choices ( maybe unless they are very unhealthy choices)
Yes. There actually is.
I main wraith because now I’m thinking with portals.
Not sure tbh, it just came up like that
added
As a Dodgers fan I would have been fine with this.  The question for Harper I guess is whether he'd have been able to sign a deal for $150M at age 30. It seems like the answer to that is likely to be yes, especially given inflation, but I can't blame him for taking the Phillies offer.
This is me, my team hates me lol
Scheiden - to separate  It's the most cryptic one, but I think it's supposed to refer to separating the basic components of matter (the chemical elements, in modern parlance), which was apparently the main goal, or at least a defining aspect, of chemistry at the time.
Anyone got vid of the whole Julio Kyle sequence? 
Bil Haley approves
I guess they never miss, huh?
I think that makes a good bit of sense. They are in a way stealing from you. Emotional damages are a thing that gets paid in lawsuits.
I think Nash has a court too but I'm not 100% sure. The court at the ridge has some lights you can turn on so you can play when it gets dark if you choose to do so. 
Pull tabs slightly wonky looking, but aside from that GL ...   In retrospect, it might be due to the angle the photo was taken. I'd GL doe.
"I'm not upset, all you guys are upset!" 
Jay:  DON’T CARE!!!
If you actually listen to what he said, you'd realize that he really didn't say anything wrong. He admitted that his feelings were wrong and fueled by anger, and was remorseful for feeling that way. If anything I have a lot more respect for the man, because what he said took tons of courage in today's atmosphere.
Wow. Thank you. So many treasures 
[Experiential Data](https://netrunnerdb.com/card_image/01066.png) - [NetrunnerDB](https://netrunnerdb.com/en/card/01066)  ***** Beep Boop. I am Clanky, the ANRBot.   [ [About me] ](https://www.reddit.com/r/anrbot/wiki) [ [Contact] ](https://www.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=just_doug&amp;subject=ANRBot)
Don't work yourself into a shoot brother. But I hate how this is turning into 2000 WCW. A little kayfabe would be nice. They're trying too hard to make it feel "real" that it undermines the story.  
Lucky, I made ~9k pots and got about 100k agility on my alt while I did it, went to sleep, woke up. All lost ;(
I'm also planning on posting more so let me know if you're interested!! 😁
 Hello CDF users! Since it is Friday, the new CDF is now live. Please follow [this link](/r/anime/comments/avxy5f/casual_discussion_fridays_week_of_march_01_2019/) to move on to the new thread.  [](#heartbot "And don't forget to be nice to new users!")  A quick note: this thread will remain open for one hour so that you can finish your conversations. Please **do not** use this thread for spamming or other undesirable behavior. Excessive violations will result in sanctions.
Socializing.
Your post reminds me that I should test medium speed weapons DPS as well. I really wish I could get some solid numbers to work with. I have seen people boast 2000-4000 damage so I was thinking of comparing critical sneak guns to that.  Aside from your initial sprinting attack, assuming you are fighting something that doesn't not out right die on first hit, are your consecutive attacks just regular button presses? Do melee users typically use regular attacks out of vats or always heavy attacks?
Thanks u/PM_ME_YOUR_HUGETITS
No that’s not my argument. My argument is that there are no conventional existential threats to nuclear armed, military capable Israel and as such they do not need American aid. Im all for cooperation between the two, but no aid.   I responded to each of your false assertions about the threatening nations towards Israel and you have not even made the slightest effort to refute which implies you either know you are wrong or you are trolling.  In terms of cooperation, Jordan, Egypt, Turkey, UAE, Kuwait and Saudi cooperate with Israel  (via unofficial channels with the Gulf states). You can read a series of reports on the topic by FT, Jerusalem Post or even NYT.
Karkat Vantas
This looks like 1,000 ft in the beginning
is there a subreddit where we can grade plastic surgeons? C-
only thing i jerk off to
I...I think that’s called a coma
Based on the color they appear to be a well aged vintage. 
Amen to that.
Yeah... I read that title and my brain definitely autocompleted that word to say "Asperger's".
I got mine for 50$
Get another one
You seem to be stuck in a loop. Take a break, reboot.
FUCK THE ISLANDERS LETS GO BABY HUGE GAME BUDS ALL DAYYYY
State mandated so incorrect. You'll see 12 states off hand who will enact the policy to allow them such.   Already in a number of states they've pushed for illegal aliens to obtain grants, and financial aid. Most recent was New Jersey which was signed into law last year.   Your argument is either ignorance or naivety. At this point I hope naivety.
if you enjoy sugar in your patties, I guess so
We’ve cracked the case! 
In this bitch acc a classic🔥
How we treat the mentally ill.  Now, don't get me wrong, it's a FAR cry better now than it was 50+ years ago when they were chained up, locked away, or given lobotomies. But unfortunately we've gone too far on the other direction, and now  we simply leave mentally ill people on the streets without any support, little help, and they are simply discarded as "you're on your own."  It's nice to not want to abuse them (of course), and it is also nice that we want them to have as much freedom as they can have (as they CAN have), but how they're treated, ignored, and written off now is sickening, and it transcends all racial, gender, socioeconomic lines, etc.
Assuming that problem didn’t happen (I was able to add a payee just fine recently), is there some reason to avoid that service?
I love paint jobs like this. The forest coming alive, bright and vibrant and angry.
Well the trichomes were all cloudy, and harvested 60 days in on a six week(supposedly fast flowering) strain. Comments on the strain  review said to let go 8 weeks instead of 6, which I'm glad I did!
Watch trump claim he turned down being on Seinfeld 
Need I remind of you Yoda’s ghost god lightning powers in TLJ?
Waitlist starts here.
This comment is art.
depends on what you really want to get out of the activity. as I get older I find it a lot more difficult to justify ~5k on summer band.   yes, there are lifetime lessons you can potentially get out of the activity but aside from connections for future teaching gigs or the slight chance that a potential employer has marched there are few concrete things that will meaningfully contribute to your future. it's definitely a balancing act that most people who march need to figure out.  if money/time isn't an issue and you really want to do it then by all means do it. otherwise DCA/open class are perfectly fine alternatives.
When are you scheduled to go on Ellen?
You did not get a placebo.  The only way to get a placebo is if you explicitly consented to a study that clearly states you may get a placebo as part of the trial. Doctors and pharmacies do not give placebos without your knowledge of the possibility.  You need to work with your doctor and maybe your pharmacist to determine why your medication is not working like it used to.
Definitely. You’re just in a nightmare, after Platinum everything will change. Just keep going, you’ll notice the differences.
i have bizarrely good luck with dittos. i've only been playing again for a couple months and i've already gotten 6 of them. they seem to love my house haha. 
You probably could warm them gently in the microwave, but you get better results with the suggested stovetop or oven methods. Plus, if they're sealed up well, they might explode in the microwave, like corn.
The west is still old Chicago then ? And ok what’s some fake Lit you’ve heard on the net that you Can speak on. Like I’ve heard about guys not being allowed to eat Lucky Charms because of a cane or some shit 💀 
Because that's what people will pay.  That's all there is to it.
yeah :)
There is a thing called transient student.   If you are going to university A, and you are temporarily posted to an area near university B, you can register at A but physically take the class at B, and it will go on your transcript back at school A, just like it was taken on campus there. Not all schools do it.   But it's worth checking into.  If you are getting a permanent change of station, you just apply to university B as a transfer undergrad student, and submit your transcripts from A and they will admit you as a new student.   So it's very straightforward.   I went to two community colleges and two 4 year institutions before I got my degree, so it's no big deal.
Johnathan young does a great cover of make my story [link](https://itunes.apple.com/us/album/make-my-story-feat-sixteeninmono/1450418878?i=1450418895)  
Mitten
Don’t be a dumbass lol. 
Sorry, Where can i find the mass drop listing? :( 
Have you found this bud in those places ?? JUNGLE BOYS AND COOKIES ONLY. Dont buy this buy jungle boys and cookies. Watch out with fake bags. 
Which would be weird since he was in "Who's Who" when he was a little kid.
I main Lifeline because I love “calling in me life line package”
IMHO, this is one of the best posts I've seen on this sub recently.
Because your account is new (under 2 days old) **OR your account has very low comment karma**, your submission has been removed. This action is **NOT** directed at you personally; /r/entitledparents requires all accounts to be at least **2 days old** AND have **at least 25 comment karma** in order to create new threads. Comment karma is **not** the same thing as link karma. If you have less than 25 comment karma, it is easy to get- simply participate in a few discussions and you'll have the amount you need in no time at all. On your user page you will see a breakdown of post versus comment karma; you may need to hover over the karma number (or the i icon) to see the details. Questions? Report this comment and let us know.  *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/entitledparents) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Translation site or it it easier to write in a language that you aren't fluent in speaking.
Thanks very much. :)  &amp;#x200B;  I'm very fortunate to live in the country I do and with the welfare system we got. I'd put alot of it down to equality, high taxes to make sure everyone can live a good live, increasing productivity and happiness for everyone! Free school and university(No paid schools) and free healthcare just makes everyone get the same chance to make a mark for themselves no matter where they come from. I think I'll leave it at that before this becomes too political. hahah
Normally I’d agree with your frustrations but in cases like *Overwatch* and now *Apex Legends* I’m okay with sexual orientation being revealed in supplementary material (which it was for Gibraltar; his backstory mentions his BF it wasn’t just a random dev on Twitter going “btw Gibraltar is gay”). These games don’t have any story (*Apex Legends* even less so than *Overwatch* at the moment) so I don’t hold them to the same standard as a story heavy game in terms of representation.  Also I suspect we’ll begin to see more supple tart material for *Apex Legends* down the line in the way of comics, short stories, animated shorts etc. and corresponding updates to in-game items like cosmetics and voice lines that tie into it, and considering the game just came out I’m willing to wait and be patient to see if Respawn integrates Gibraltar’s sexual orientation more into his character over time.
There are no skaven in Altdorf...
Where does it say this though? They should have better guidelines straight from the group that decided which battery to put in these computers. 
I’m one week behind you..... was really hoping for mine this week... guess not XD
 The Javvy token sale may technically represent an investment by merit of there being an initial offering, but token holders have no expectation of profit; only of the token’s utility within the application. 
you have big gay
I think they mean the ISIS attack on her concert in Manchester.
Wasn't expecting an animal crossing reference, have an upvote
This is what irks me so - If I believe a pregnancy is a life, then that goes along with my argument that abortion is murder. In terms of logic, it’s pretty consistent. It’s important to me that a person isn’t murdered - and then we can discuss social programs like how our society could do more for those wanting to adopt. 
I park in the "reserved for heroes (which consists of firemen, policemen, and military folk)" I figure no one will question me and I'm more of a hero than a lot of people in those fields. Like, maybe you can only park here if you saved a puppy from a burning building. I'd respect that. 
And truly some seriously lo effort low IQ moronic stupidity. Couldn't even pre-organize their incoherent rants 
Guarantees double LR /s
Sent, enjoy your Emboar! :\^)
Yeah, hence the term "reactionary" 
I drink water like a fish and only drink on Saturdays when I got a nice easy rest sunday to recover
Maybe KKK wants you to join 
What you don’t hear is how a lot of those immigrants weren’t even considered white at the time like Irish and Italian people. Or how a lot of European immigrants were absolutely shit on for being Catholic and not Protestant.
I saw here that his last tweet was "big nut", what a way to go
Facts! Report them too.
&gt; Or a story where the stakes are so low that you can consistently lose, but still walk away. That's not a lot of stories.   I have get the same effect. It's a nice romp for an open world, do-what-you-want type ordeal but I feel it won't have nearly the same impact for larger more focused stories.   It also has room for improvement (at least in shadow of war) as some of the bits felt contrived and a bit random.
They been revealing stuffs in a weird way tbh this leak generate more hype than any of their kombat kasts so far so in the long run this is actually good marketing 
Lmao at blue shirt guy's quarter-assed attempt to grab him before he slid off.
Rule 2.
watch out for the herpes!
oml like my only reddit post is about AP computer science principles
How dare Blizzard do this, Genji is now literally unplayable.
Is that a 240 bumper? 
Shockedpikachu.jpg
My parents believe I'm on the spectrum, they do their best to warn me/let me know if I say something too blunt/rude without thinking. Neither are diagnosed, my autism was a bit of a spontaneous generation in my family, thanks to being born early.  I'm pretty close to my parents - I was downright enmeshed with my mom, because I had a hard time keeping friends. We're untangling that dynamic now that I've moved to attend college, and I think we're going pretty well.  Granted, there have been a few bumps in the road (who doesn't go through a stage where they hate their parents at some point?) and there might be things that all of us wish we could go back in time to change, but I love them still.
Hi sorry I’m on mobile and the post was still pending.  We have a 150 gallon pond in the backyard filled with other kois, goldfish, and one pleco (not sure how old it is but it’s pretty big. About a foot).  We noticed 2 of the goldfish and pleco started missing fins and/or scales. The pleco has since recovered with no intervention. But the 2 other goldfish aren’t doing so well. They are both currently quarantined in separate containers.  The other fish in the pond seem to be doing just fine.   Here’s the other fish, he is missing his tail. http://imgur.com/tOAog8f  It makes me incredibly sad that they are hurt and hope they can recover! Thanks for any advice or suggestions you may have. 
Second unpopular opinion here. CALEO IS NOT MADE UP. Not more than Percy/Calipso. She was condemned to fall in love with every hero that lands in Ogigia. It was her fate to love him. ACTUALLY, when she becomes reluctant about her choice in TOA, as sign that her imposed fate is vanishing, the circle starts to close.  About Leo, well he would fall in love with any girl that is close enough to him. Rick was being fateful and coherent to his own lore.
Same here. NOA barely work and maybe used for 5 times. Autopark 0 time and summon was like twice. 
lol
I think that is for the upcoming new vehicle
Akuma
Melts in your mouth not in your hands
Sweep your floor, scum.
Maybe since it’s a plane and doesn’t have super fast acceleration plus the hanger being a much larger area to load than the garage you may have to hit rt a litter bit before a. Just my thoughts, I’ll be doing this glitch after my lobby expires 
I guess you can say you're experiencing some transconfusion
How is Frank still hurt? His original timeline was 1-2 weeks, it’s been over a month.
Well at least you noticed it’s around his throat
###Nice try boomers you already did this once. 
Tell her I roll the sleeves up so I don't have to buy short shirts (which are a scam by Big Sleeves whos trying to convince you that you need different shirts for the summer)
Honestly I didn't think any of the tweets were kayfabe breaking until this tweet. Becky faking the mugshots could've easily been explained in kayfabe since Becky's character is insecure, but now Becky has turned it into a kayfabe breaking story. Ronda isn't doing it any favors either now, but this tweet really started it. 
Vanilla Coke was the fucken tits back in the day. They need to offer that in more stores 
“HONEY GO OVER TO THAT POSTER AND PUT YOUR HAND ON IT SO MOMMY CAN TAKE A PICTURE”
I use to have a Xbox but once I got a ps4 it just felt way better
You underestimate my power
Ok hold on... she's been doing this for how long? And she throws away the socks?  *How much money has she spent buying new socks to wipe her ass with?*
Ok gj, we are talking about 1080p 240hz here
but then it plays Minecraft music for an hour straight.
I never heard stuff like that. I don’t hate fortnite but minecraft was one of a kind and very fresh and innovative. Still is. Can’t really compare it’s success to a game that part of another genre trend.
I'm a terrible sniper, so the only time I play widow is during mystery heroes. Then, I'm a Widow 76 that usually gets the gold for objective time, lol. Always makes everyone laugh at the shock of a Widow on the point. =)
Lol I was so obsessed with Phil I didn't even.notice 😂😂😂
those pesky scientists in their universities studying stem cell
Or I can just replace the words "racist" and "sexist" with something else, and I would be defending Brie's insightful and thought provoking comment.  Because what even is equivalency, amirite?
N
I think that can be arranged 😉
That’s only a 6000t one, you could chuck it’s engines in emergency astern and do some high frequency cycling, it’ll be stopped in about 6-7 times its length.
YORKSHIRE!
I was on such a high after the Deluxe Demo, now I'm back to being conflicted.  Part of me still wants to get this and see how things turn out, part of me wants to retract my apology to Shimbori, refuse to support his practices and just wait for MK11. Besides, it's not like I'm not gonna be busy over the next two months anyway...
Sorry Man She cant be ur waifu if she is dead.
Toda la razón. A muchos les ardió el hoyo y no consideran que los europeos son xenófobos y racistas con personas de otras religiones como los musulmanes, que hablan idiomas diferentes, y/o que tienen sus propias costumbres a veces radicalmente diferentes. Acá tratamos con migrantes que hablan español, que en su mayoría tienen un trasfondo judeocristiano, y que provienen de países colonizados solo por España, y nos hacemos los "demasiado diferentes". Para el resto del mundo somos una masa sudaca homogénea.
I don’t know if I personally would take a rental off-roading but there are a lot of amazing Jeep trails in AZ. There are websites like azoffroading.com or apps like all trails that rate the trails by difficulty that you can check out. There are also tours like pink Jeep tours in Sedona that look fun too. 
I did the same. It's been good so far. I really appreciate these guys and their awesome coffee.
So this basically removes employment protections from card holders? I drive a work truck around all day (I don’t medicate while at work or while driving.) so if someone tbones me, they can fire me? That’s what I got from it. 
So you accept that the Jeremiah parallels are easily explained by both Jesuses acting in the mold of Jeremiah and so referring to/being depicted referring to that book? Good. Which means another supposed support for derivation falls away. Leaving you with ... nothing of any substance.
Tummy goals!!! 
Oh I don’t care if you don’t like her. Everybody is entitled to their own opinion. I respect that. Just wish you haters would do the same.
/r/truegaming for discussions/text posts  /r/games for news articles, announcements/trailers, and the occasional discussion post
I am the defibrillator electrodes.
I'm here for the palette. I've been obsessed with that one lately!
Die in a fire
Am I misunderstanding the fact that you no longer need to use GVT to invest in managers? I know there are concerns about the price when managers sell the investments to begin a program, but doesn't this effectively make it unnecessary to hold GVT, aside from the profits you receive when a program closes?
Looks cool but don’t lie it’s not f1 
I'm worried about the fact that I've never seen an autistic royal   &amp;#x200B;  [https://www.cheatsheet.com/entertainment/does-the-queen-take-medication.html/](https://www.cheatsheet.com/entertainment/does-the-queen-take-medication.html/)  [https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2018/apr/22/homeopathy-quackery-plain-and-simple-whatever-royal-family-says](https://www.theguardian.com/commentisfree/2018/apr/22/homeopathy-quackery-plain-and-simple-whatever-royal-family-says)  [https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/prince-charles/10433939/Prince-Charles-and-homeopathy-crank-or-revolutionary.html](https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/uknews/prince-charles/10433939/Prince-Charles-and-homeopathy-crank-or-revolutionary.html)  [https://englishhistoryauthors.blogspot.com/2014/01/the-royal-medicine-monarchs-longtime.html](https://englishhistoryauthors.blogspot.com/2014/01/the-royal-medicine-monarchs-longtime.html)
Snowboard addiction has some great videos to learn from.   Train that lower body like nobody's business. lots of 5 - 10 second squats and hold a lunge as long as you can.   Twisting situps will help alot.,   start doing yoga, this will help with core flexibility and strenght.  
Thanks for the recommendation! What’s their minimum gallon tank? I got a space in my room that I believe is 24 inches long, and 12 inches wide.
 Honestly I put the ham back in the fridge.
How many pullups can you do in a row before hitting failure? How many if you left 3 good ones in the tank?  Just asking cause I can get just about 10 decent ones in a row. But if I tried 5x10 it would never happen. I personally do 10 sets of 5 and it works out good.
There's a limit to the amount of gold 1 character can hold. That limit is 10 million.
&gt; only this season he's been utter wank.  &gt; Lets not rewrite history.  uhhhhhh
I’ve only read the manga somI know the entire story. Should I watch the beginning of the original anime, then watch the end of Brotherhood? I don’t want to watch the anime-only ending they made up. 
We got a top 5 player from this class
Pathfinder, My robot dude has the most mobile kit for me to rush in with.
Honestly, Sound Awake is their strongest album to date IMHO...  Asymmetry was great, but it didn't strike the same chord that Sound Awake did.
Lemme know if you get anything good in your packs 
what kind of joke does a farmer make       a corny one
Maybe I'm looking for something that doesn't exist or I dont know myself what I'm looking for. I just want to get a good job that pays well and I will be able to enjoy the work environment
I'm not ashamed for having served, but there are definite instances within that service that could bring shame (and article 15s).  Notably, one of those medals I'm not wearing is the good conduct medal. 
o la ctamos, no quiere un viaje en helicoptero para que vea como van las investigaciones ?
Practice more instead of bitching about a skill you lack.
The state.   Not the people.   Screw the state.
Mod and bp drops are on different drop tables.
#P E N I S ! ! ! ! 
And.. mods deleted it.  Moderating sucks
Every week. 
THIS IS NSFW
It’s true
This package makes cars drive like Xfinity cars, and I think he does ok there.
You mean one erection? 
https://youtu.be/q1FDgD63ngE 
Completely Agree!
Yeah, but as literally everyone else has said, I was hoping for Azura. I lliterally worked my ass off for Olivia only to find that Azura existed... :/ Duma onky has one movement tile so.... still a good character 
I like your designs a lot, but that is some hella expensive shipping. 
For a second I thought the team was getting renamed and I got excited
how long ago were you 5 or 6 
Did she use those words
It's not. smokin_bones there must have been smokin too many bones.
2nd this
Ok so you just don't like it when people disagree with you, and you're having a fear based reaction to losing art posts.  Very deep
Also horrendous for the planet. So much CO2 emissions
Are you talking about Disneys Aladdin?
he turns it down right away and she says she's ok. not a big deal imo
No you misunderstand, 2033 is the year it comes out
Oh a fixing a bug that was on ptr for 2 days is a huge nerf lmao
I hope it means the main feature unit of the banner.
I agree. I love the prisoner. He is awesome 
I think your being a bit harsh, it's a well balanced response, from his reply, he has showed that the coverage of the story was without opinions. x said this which turned out not to be true and y said this. News is not suppose to have an agender only to present what people have said, to fact check and show both sides then it is up to the reader to take their own position. Which is TECHNICALLY what the article does, it would have been nice if he had at least acknowledged that they only showed the positive opinions in the last a few paragraphs and are way fewer in number which is bullshit, as if he doesn't know that most people do not read the whole thing. But the person who responded to you did a good job, and was respectful.  HOWEVER I do see your problem with the original article, if you read the whole thing it's just about ok. But I would not call it balanced since the majority of the article is in the negative and then changes to the positive in the last few paragraphs. In order for the article to be balanced they would need to give at least 5 more quotes on the positive side or show both sides as you read and not have polar opposites at the top and bottom. This is an issue with soooo many news articles where the title is completely discounted by the end of the article. So I don't think the issue is with the BBC, it's about the click bait nature of news. We should be attacking all news that publish articles like this. All of news loves to shit us up by claiming the world will end tomorrow and in the last paragraph they spoke to an expert who said the world will definitely be fine. There is so much bullshit in news and it sucks that this is the accepted format of articles. I think it's also worth pointing out that in general the BBC is one of the better news sources out there, There are so many that will just straight lie to your face and not even give you the opposing opinions, These news agencies are the true enemy of humanity that seek to divide us! While I support your post I would also like to point out that by us discussing the article and then sending everyone to read it we are just making the problem worse cause the metrics will tell the BBC this article performed well and improved SEO. I don't know what the solution is but I know it's a larger issue that has nothing to do with the BBCs opinion of trans people. I spoke to a lot of BBC employees at London pride and a huge proportion of their employees identify as being on the gender spectrum so be careful about going after them. There are way worse enemies and I'm sure many of you have some good examples.
Yo get this, I've had two kids message me asking for MORE. Every time I post an offer I think this it it, I'll just OP and be done. But this is just insane.
Yep. Honestly I liked Conor as a casual because I watched a couple of fights and his fighting style is exciting as fuck. After I saw him talk shit I liked him more but mostly just because he backed it up. Talking shit shouldn't be a fighters go to. If they want to make money they need to be exciting and if they can tack on some brilliant shit talk, that's a plus.
Where did you get that info from?
Me trying to get the joke for about 10 minutes.
He still had to have burnt himself...
Thank you 
People are insane.
NSFL?
You originally pushed back against another comment saying that neither the government nor Bernie Sanders are socialist.   My question is, “So what?”   Are you trying to show that just because they’re not “socialist” in the truest sense of the word, that that makes the policies of the government or of Bernie Sanders ok? Or that socialist-leaning stuff is ok, as long as it’s not full-blown socialism?  I merely pointed out that even though government policies may not meet a strict, technical definition of the word “socialist”, it does NOT make said policies tolerable. I find that being forced to give 1/3 of my working life to the government is ridiculous. It is too much already, and it is already worth putting a line in the sand and saying “you’re not taking another penny from me”. 
I think it should have bright sparks coming out from the other side of the wall, kind of like with Thermite and Hibana.
¤ȟ §ȟȋț, ȋț§ ÿ¤ɥ j¤ȟñ
Man these comments are a cesspool
Oh my fuck hahahahahahahahahahah
What did BioWare say about Tassyn?
I hope you rebottled that salt... Or that's a huge waste of salt. Not even kidding.  Unless this was at a restaurant, in which case, you're an asshole whether you did or didn't.  Edit: Yes I overreacted, but the irony of OP's username is hilarious.
The first is zeds blades and the second is vaynes crossbow, although the first does remind of irelias blades pre vgu
Unfortunately, a large chunk, explaining what we mean by civil, got lost. There's a word limit too posts that I forgot about so that part of has been lost in cyberspace's neverlands.  I did explain, that part of being civil means to move on and not engage when a civil conversation is deemed unlikely. De-escalation is the word to go by. You can try to reason but if the conversation partner displays irrational behaviour just be virtuous and virtually walk away from it. In the end it will be better for your mental health and do wonders for your self-esteem.  We do not accept anyone telling us that the other one started it. You won't believe (how presumptuous, you probably can) how often we hear this (even without the be civil rule in place). So to anyone who this might apply to: this is not a schoolyard and we are sure you don't want to be treated like we are on one. So, there might be an opportunity for you to act like you are not of that age. And for others /r/lego is not an opportunity for you to fall back into behaviour patterns of times gone by.
I want this. 
Waste taxpayer money and help create welfare systems in 3rd world nations to be entirely reliant on the USA. Also sex tourism.
Who knew pokemon would make such a big impression
Adorable. She must have strong maternal instincts. 
Kudos!
Ace here, extremely, very same.
In the future memes will also be puzzles where there's hundreds of captions laid out on top of each other and you have to match it all together 
How does the sound on that Octopre compare with with transparency of the RME? 
🎤🎤🎤🎤🎤
Everything that everyone has said, and the eyes. It might sound cheesy, but if you know someone well enough you can see a dullness there. Eyes are truly the window to the soul.
Aren't we the special and lucky one.
It’s very difficult, and can take years to achieve. But it’s life-changing and there’s a ton of online support videos on YouTube that can give free help on this topic
I cannot play Zed unless I rush black cleaver, regardless of meta.
My life long goal is to try and swim in a pool full of jello, so I wish you were right.
The amswer is simple. People still buy the games and Nintendo makes money. 
Correct. No one is upset at people that can't be vaccinated due to legitimate medical conditions. People are angry at other people who choose not to vaccinate because of personal beliefs that have been thoroughly disproven.
Theres not a different. People just love labels. Bi people totally love and get with trans people.  My wife is bi. I'm a transman. 
PULL UP ON YO BLOCK THEN I BLEED IT
This is why we need a crusade against anyone who thinks there are 50+ genders 
It's a classic u/rogersimon10 comment who is known for his great stories about his dad
Wow they are amazing 
Pls mark NSFW. That's a naked cactus.
The fact it seems like this medium requires every color of the spectrum to get desired results has been enough to abate my curiosity in it. I'm aware there is a beauty in using what you have to get a result. But like you, 4 tubes of paint can get you so much further. That said, I have a few smaller tubes for rare accents that can't easily be done consistently via mixing.
Honestly, I don't see this at all. While it clearly looks like a humanoid inside of a tree, the tree looks nothing like a prison. The tree itself is also a humanoid, mirroring the motions of the figure within (compare the two major branches to the figure's arms). It looks a lot more like an augment or a suit than a prison.
97% larger (4032x3024) version of linked image:  [https://pbs.twimg.com/media/D0h\_qt8WsAAhlMd.jpg?name=orig](https://pbs.twimg.com/media/D0h_qt8WsAAhlMd.jpg?name=orig)  *****  ^[source&amp;nbsp;code](https://github.com/qsniyg/maxurl)&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[website](https://qsniyg.github.io/maxurl/)&amp;nbsp;/&amp;nbsp;[userscript](https://greasyfork.org/en/scripts/36662-image-max-url)&amp;nbsp;(finds&amp;nbsp;larger&amp;nbsp;images)&amp;nbsp;|&amp;nbsp;[remove](https://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=MaxImageBot&amp;subject=delete:+ehiksu7&amp;message=If%20you%20are%20the%20one%20who%20submitted%20the%20post%2C%20it%20should%20be%20deleted%20within%2020%20seconds.%20If%20it%20isn%27t%2C%20please%20check%20the%20FAQ%3A%20https%3A%2F%2Fnp.reddit.com%2Fr%2FMaxImage%2Fcomments%2F8znfgw%2Ffaq%2F)
I’m in love 
Um, no. Or in any other women's keto group on Reddit, for that matter. 
I honestly had no idea that was a racial slur. I just thought I was looking at a tongue-in-cheek protester at some kind of LARPing event before I saw the subreddit. 
I main Mirage just cause his voice lines are the best 😊
I didn't realize you were going all Grandma's Kitchen on me. Okay, you could buy both of those things at the supermarket but assuming you're making them totally from scratch:  Pizza sauce takes 10 minutes of simmering on the stove so that's not even an argument.  Pizza crust from scratch takes 3 minutes of actual work and then 30 minutes of waiting for it to proof while you jerk off and watch YouTube. It's really easy to make is what I'm saying.  You could have a 2500 calorie meal on the table in 45 minutes if you're working from flour and raw tomatoes, or 15 minutes if you're a normal person that just buys that shit. But of course that doesn't take in to account the necessity of owning a cow, milking it, letting the milk ferment and age...
software so good u CANT BELIEVE ITS ***FREE***
Source?
No won’t be a problem. Also learn punctuation, this was fucking impossible to read 
Hahaha got em purple pills too✌🏼✌🏼✌🏼 and yeah nothing compares to that flood of endorphins 😂
I main Bloodhound tracking and pinging hostiles for my team is the best
Yaaaamtastic
You must be a real cheerful person. 
Let me clear this up.  This is in Brazil.  On left is a plain hot dog.  On right is a hot dog but with fried onions, peppers, and extra meat. It's kinda like a chili dog, hence the cost.
They sell stuff like Mio near my place, which is fake Koolaid-like concentrate, and they sell frozen juice cans that make a whole pitcher at a time. I've never seen fruit juice to put in water though, not in forms that are convenient for one cup at a time.
It’s kinda of impossible to make a good faith deal with America now.
if i were to smugly comment “hmm, it’s almost as if men are violent” on a post about two men getting into a fight, that’d be retarded, right? that’s a blatant blanket statement that obviously doesn’t apply to all men, and isn’t excused by basic mental functions   anyway please quit being retarded that would be really cool
Its black boxed - inside the driver, nobody knows because Pimax havent published any docs.
Bruh, he was so intoxicated to the point of not being able to pick his head up for mugshot 
Great story! You're welcome anytime =)
Just googled and it looks great! Not a long term course, you’re right, but will be good to tide me over until I can enroll in evening classes. Thanks! 
I guess I'm weary of any kind of branding of "alternative" when it comes to health care.  It's a very ambiuous word and usually points away from evidence based practices.  There's a strong case to be made that some or all of the TTI constitutes "alternative" therapy.  but it's worth observing that what we experienced falls largely under "Cognitive Behavioral Therapy" and you can largely screen with that knowledge.  Communication with the therapist is essential to success anyway, so getting this out there when setting up an appointment is the most direct and clear cut approach.
oh for fuck sake, that's not how reiki works. 
Will these work in a Dell R720?
As far as echo chambers are concerned nothing beats r/the_Donald 
I think it's a bit of both.  There was probably a group of people who secretly disbelieved in religion in general, but couldn't speak up because they'd be persecuted.  And, there was probably a group of people who truly, fully believed all of it.  And, the group of folks at the heart of it, was probably a very small minority of people (or one person) who was simply sadistic and wanted to kill women, so they used witchcraft as the excuse.
I don’t know what Bond is but SmartThings should be able to communicate with any HTTPS based API.
Unfortunately just more sounds. I'm hopeful there will be more octaves in a future update.
First spawn helicopters shouldn’t exist, plain and simple. No vehicle that isn’t a tank in *ground* realistic battles should be spawnable off start. This would mean people have to actually play the match to hop in their bullshit helicancer as well as having let the enemy team spawn SPAA or aircraft as a counter, increasing the needed skill for heli pilots instead of the braindead rush spawn maneuver.    SL rewards are garbage though I agree. There’s no reason to even shoot an enemy if you have to use unlocked shells; you’d do better to cap and then soak a few shots and leave the match. 
of courseee. have you been to any astroworld shows?
what does it spin on, then? whatever it spins on is it’s axis. That’s the definition of an axis.  You’re saying the planet doesn’t spin at all, which is absurd 
That's funny -- which party has predominantly spent their energy trying to tank climate change legislation for the last 30-forever years?
What’ is your shoe size 
I envy your consistent right-click last minute jumping tech.
Greek saved his life haha 
Why are you on pornhub op?
Managing Challenging Behaviors in Schools: Research-Based Strategies That Work by Kathleen Lynne Lane PhD and Holly Mariah Menzies PhD  ·      Class wide Positive Behavior Interventions and Supports: A Guide to Proactive Classroom Management by Brandi Simonsen PhD, Diane Myers PhD  ·      How to Reach and Teach Children with Challenging Behavior By Kaye L. Otten &amp; Jodie L. Tuttle  The Tough Kids Toolkit (Go to their website and order it)
Turnout among eligible voters has been above 50% in every single Presidential election over the past century
Are these not server-side updates? 
With bread
Oh yeah I know that. 
Wow didn't evem realise that, welp gonna take a miracle now for Fulham and Huddersfield
Kinda like having a Russian-compromised President for the sake of owning the libs!!1!1 amirite :)  We lost nothing of value, because these summits never had any potential in the first place. I’m celebrated the curtains being pulled back on another one of Trump’s frauds. 
I'm 5'11'' and a size UK 8 which I think is pretty average/on the smaller size for a girl my height; I have shorter girl friends who are 2 shoe sizes bigger than me, yet I always get comments on my shoes! I think it's because I have narrow feet which makes them look bigger as well. So annoying. Be grateful for your small feet, I'm clumsy enough with my in proportion size! At least you can buy cute shoes in most stores &lt;3
I have Tavares puts in 4 goals and skates right over to smelly borelli
*\*that moment when you can't go any further\**
This might just be the greatest thing I’ve ever seen on Reddit! My daughter is about this kids age and I will be trying this tomorrow!
In the ‘about’ part of this sub there’s a link that describes narcissistic behaviour/traits
This is awesome. Thanks for the writeup!
I've been crushing on her for years 😍😘
Thanks! I'll be sure to keep posting as progress happens, hoping to get the car rust-free by the end of the summer. (aka replacing half the car, lol).
Hmmm, maybe every 5 white people count as 3 votes.... we could call it the 5/3rds compromise. 
Meh.  Coin toss 
Budget suit
Pm'd
Oops! Lolol
But people who are serious
I did it in gym class. It isn't bad doing a normal rock wall. When you start getting on different slopes and actually going outside to do it, that's a different story.
Is this the larger or smaller sized santos? 
KILL IT WITH ~~FIRE~~ INK
 I wanna cum on her thong! 
Oh, my, wow!  This is great!  Congratulations.  Bravo.  clap clap clap
Meh.  
FIGHT FIGHT FIGHT FIGHT FIGHT FIGHT FIGHT 
Ty.  Cant find it in the app but will try the website
And then Jo, Ben, Tobi, JB, JJ, Bobi and TJ in a box suite in October. 
Those things have zero effect on being gay, they just affect how in the closet someone will be
But but they emphasized OBP.  I really don't think you can be legit good by emphasizing OBP and pure contact. Yes, the Red Sox had a ton of good hitters, but it was not just OBP, they had power.  Balance&gt;&gt;&gt;going full OBP and contact.
Yeah that's right, I remember now hearing somewhere that the Gelgoog was performance wise on par with or better than Amuro's RX-78. Part of the reason Zeon lost A Baoa Qu and why the Gelgoog wasn't as mass produced as it could've been (other than the short time period between the first Gelgoog and the end of the war) was mainly 2 reasons:  A) that by the time they had any real number of Gelgoogs, Zeon had at the time killed off many of their ace and experienced pilots, leaving largely inexperienced ones in the 'googs while the surviving GM pilots attacking A Baoa were battle-hardened  B) IIRC, Zeon spent so much money/time/R&amp;D power on new and diverse MS that they were innovative, but few in numbers or cross-compatible parts. Compared to GMs, which despite varieties are essencially mostly parts-compatible, many of the OYW Zeke suits weren't parts-compatible etc. due to many variations of design difference (i.e. between a Gogg and a Gelgoog vs. an Aqua GM and a RGM-79GH).  This somewhat led to the GM being a mass produced jack-of-all-trades, master of none situation, where the specialized GM versions/variants were at times met and exceeded by their specifically designed Zeon counterparts (especially regarding aquatic variants). 
N
My bad. So. A live flash drive is a regular flash drive that is prepared as a bootable device. Two main uses for this are the ability to carry around a clean, working OS, and the ability to use it as installation media for the OS. If you have access to another windows machine, visit https://www.pendrivelinux.com/  If you download YUMI and a decent linux distribution ( distrowatch.com to see a list of all the popular distributions available, I recommend Ubuntu or linux mint if you have never used linux before) you can use YUMI to create a flash drive with the OS on it and you might have some luck with mounting your HDD while installed in the original machine.   DISCLAIMER: if the drive is damaged beyond repair, everything I just told you could be a wild goose chase and may not help you at all in recovering the data you are trying to recover. However, if you plan on doing any data recovery in the future, or you would like to help a friend out (or yourself) in the future when they can’t remember their password to their windows computer, with some practice you’ll be able to throw that drive in there and do some wizardry in front of them lol. Good luck 
That's certainly within the realm of possibility. It might become possible to associate fAegon with the sun (though he hasn't been associated with that imagery as far as I can recall), where he'll rise in the east and die in Westeros. The ironborn could be the sea. The Mountain could burn up and have his ashes blow around.  None of this is super likely as of now imo but I'd say it's still within reason.
Oh my god that’s incredible! Keep it up
If you want sushi just go to Karma. Happy hour days are cheap. 
This post was marked as a question and has been removed to reduce clutter. If your question was not answered please repost in the Weekly Questions Megathread or Weekly Team Building Megathread linked at the top of the subreddit
They said money couldn’t buy happiness, well this lesbian bought a hooker and that my friends is happiness.
I ranked MCU movies once based on how much I enjoyed them. I marathoned all of them over a flu-tinted like 5 day period and ranked them not based on technical merit or story telling but which put a goofy grin on my face and I wanted to see again.  Ragnarok topped the list.
Hey we needed another one of these posts 
Nice what are the pills xanax 1mg?
Stupid idea. Not every state has the same quality of hospital. I literally was just talking to a doctor in the midwest about a patient he couldn't treat, so they sent them to another state clinic, which was unsuccessful. That state then sent them to a top of the line hospital in another state with a world class doctor. The patient was finally cured. If we implement it state by state, then how do you work out the differences in care if a patient needs to see a different physician in a different state. How does billing work or reciprocity? How does recovery work? How does triage work? We were literally discussing in this very thread how nonhomogenous country have a harder time dealing with policy and your solution is to find ways to divide the country even more?  And can you imagine the shit show if states that are divided equally by political policy have to reach this decision. Imagine Florida, which has voted red many times the last few elections but has an almost equal blue population was declined universal health care because the Republicans didn't want it. They're the 3rd largest state and it would be a fucking shit show. Either implement it throughout the country or not at all. 
You appear to have submitted an instance of wordplay. As such, it has been automatically removed.  Please make sure to read and understand the subreddit's rules before posting in the future.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/Showerthoughts) if you have any questions or concerns.*
oye, othar, me resulta difícil conversar contigo porque percibo que no aceptas argumentos más bien básicos ... volvamos al origen, el gran agujero de las jubilaciones anticipadas.  . .  ¿Cuál es la máxima anticipación, y la anticipación media? Dos años respecto de la edad legal de la jubilación. Desconozco el dato de anticipación media, pero intuyo que puede estar en torno a 18 meses.  . .  Así pues, ¿cual es el coste inmediato para la SS de una jubilación anticipada? Sería la suma de las pensiones a pagar durante la anticipación, más la ausencia de cotizaciones en caso de que se estuviera trabajando, menos las cotizaciones del (supuesto) nuevo empleo de relevo.  . .  ¿Y se cobra la misma pensión si te jubilas anticipadamente? Claramente, no. Existe varias factores que reducen la pensión entre un 5% y un 10%.  . .  ¿Por tanto el coste inmediato de una jubilación anticipada termina siendo compensado pasados unos años? Claro, hombre, alrededor de unos 10 a 12 años después el coste queda compensado, mientras que se sigue cobrando una pensión reducida de por vida  . .  ¿Y es que acaso tenemos ahora mismo un boom desproporcionado de jubilaciones anticipadas? Pues no, la tasa de jubilaciones anticipadas es más o menos constante  . .  ¿Pero entonces, dónde esta el gran agujero? Pues no hay tal agujero debido a las jubilaciones anticipadas. Los verdaderos agujeros son otros que no merece la pena volver a repetir
I hope so! I loved that stuff.
Lifeline because wifeline
Use the formation subs or put him at the SUBLB 2 spot
That’s my question, what the hell does she have going for her???
Glad u love it!💜😘
ROMA
diapermates.com  r/abdl
You can buy a base F-150 for 28k or get a fully optioned out limited for 67k. Which EVs cost less than 61k that offer what a model 3 does at that price point? 
Oh yeah defiantly! I'm in for SSW so I might not be the best person to talk to regarding this. Also I'm not looking at working in a hospital. 
I get no results looking for Armory, Armory Bonus or Bonus
You’ll see :D   Good luck with your challenges SHAGGA x
Thank you, /u/kjay1010! You have awarded karma to user /u/pentiux_.  --Moderators of /r/Market76
Imma wut?
Shocking...
And her eyeball measurements are accurate why?
&gt;make sure that the resume reflects the first jobs are the same company and he was promoted.   &gt; I'll edit it to reflect that.   &gt;he can include that the other jobs are contracts.  Would it be ok to just put "Contract" in parentheses next to the job?  &gt;if he is pursuing his PMP then i would include that on his resume.  Can he just put PMP in progress? 
Think I'd fire any coach who doesn't think Casemiro should be playing.  
Also consider that Africa's population [is expected to rise from 1.2 billion to nearly 6 billion by 2100.](https://www.dailymail.co.uk/sciencetech/article-3192285/World-s-population-soar-11-billion-2100-HALF-live-Africa-claims-report.html)  That, coupled with the southern hemisphere going to shit, will create a migration crisis into western nations that will utterly collapse them.  We're heading straight into the mouth of hell and almost no one even fucking realizes it.  Europe has a population of around 800 million. Try adding 5 billion Africans into the mix and tell me how the continent survives.  At the very least, there are people like you who understand.
Yes pretty much, you don’t have to soak your shoe in it either.
This honestly makes me a little sad. Im not even that old (27) but i miss the good old days
Which pack has that hairstyle? I love it.
Don’t discourage your husband from touching you in a way you don’t like or else he’ll cheat on you??
Whole lotta nothin
&gt; Cool character, some very importaint moments, the show would be worse without him, but in the end I just never connected with him and so his death is just an event to me.  I think the worst thing about Shino dying, other than the frustrating moment of failure, is the fact that he had one of the most unique Mobile Suits in the series and only got to use it like 3 times including once when it was just there for backup.  [](#emptyinside)  &gt; Rustal so far despite being the current antagonist really hasn't done anything overly underhand or sneaky  I think hiring a mercenary to infiltrate Tekkadan and start a war between Arbrau and SAU to try to ruin someone's reputation would count as underhanded.
Where am I
This sounds like a plausible source for the rumor. Fan of the band gets morphed into being a member... 
For people with a hard preference for dark skin on their partners? 
It’s not imaginary, you literally just used a racial slur to describe a pepper.
Thanks!
I will survive- Gloria Gaynor 
There's A LOT of EU. About 40 years worth. The odds of ALL of it being "bad" is astronomically low. This is a company line that Disney created to justify, understandably, retconning Post-OT EU.  The Old Republic era has been covered in hundreds of books, comics, games, etc.   A lot of it outshines the movies. The thing with EU is that there was as much shit as there were gems to be found in it. People who praise and lament it becoming "Legends" do so for the gems, not the shit.
Even without the can Johnny gives off such boomer energy.
No.
Hey Carl my man good luck 
[Family wage is a sexist and antiquated term that was used by male employees to describe a wage given to a man that could support a non-working wife and children.](https://www.encyclopedia.com/social-sciences/dictionaries-thesauruses-pictures-and-press-releases/family-wage)   Hilarious because you throughout this thread stomp your feet and demand we stop tipping because of it's problematic roots, yet here you are demanding something else with problematic roots.
This guy came straight from the heroes guild
ViperInTheMotor
r/pokemongo
God damn.. I wasn't expecting a large answer.. You're totally right, just what I think, although I didn't wrote much 
Mighty Crom!
Alright, sorry I have come with this, but, Im trying to use watercolor stains and this is the code of the picture and the satin and how I wrote it:  `&lt;img src='`[`https://images-wixmp-ed30a86b8c4ca887773594c2.wixmp.com/intermediary/f/fb9da4b6-117d-4be0-ad56-7cd5d4d8c244/d1rmrhf-687cc948-0618-407c-b470-49ce9a5e0cda.jpg`](https://images-wixmp-ed30a86b8c4ca887773594c2.wixmp.com/intermediary/f/fb9da4b6-117d-4be0-ad56-7cd5d4d8c244/d1rmrhf-687cc948-0618-407c-b470-49ce9a5e0cda.jpg)`' style='position:absolute; left:0px; top:615px; width: 100%;'&gt;`  &amp;#x200B;  `&lt;img src='`[`https://i.imgur.com/sKQMREa.png`](https://i.imgur.com/sKQMREa.png)`' style='position:absolute; left:-50px; top:-70px; width: 100%; mix-blend-mode:darken;'&gt;`  but the result, visually, is [this](https://imgur.com/a/6fXcHXq), the stain fades into the picture instead of been the opposite and overlap on it, what am I doing wrong?  &amp;#x200B;  &amp;#x200B;
Please don't disparage the noble family tradition of slumlording.
Yes-men are toxic.
Yes I love it so much! Still gives me goosebumps!
I'd like a pic of you
This just changed my life THANK YOU 
Isn't it amazing how everyone on Reddit is an expert or has a friend who is an expert on the thing they're arguing for?   I bet everything feels some sort of pain. I doubt ripping roots out if the ground feels great when they've literally grown into the dirt for support. The point is, pain or not, people have to eat and we eat like most mammals: other things. Be that plants or bugs or fish or animals, we need to eat to live.  We can only test for the pain we understand. Just the same as we can only see the colors we can comprehend. There are colors out in the world we can't see because we physically can't comprehend them, just check the mantis shrimp out.
Pathfinder. Best Legend imo
If there were memes back in the 80s in Britain 
Anet got chrono right like 5 balance patches ago. They need to just fucking stop needing it, and start buffing the boom output of other support classes like the firebrand and herald.
This is what happens when my company outsources software to india
Sauce
For your first time? Won't make a difference IMO   I lost mine to my first serious girlfriend before we were even a couple, don't think it made things better/worse at all.  
It’s just not true dumb dumb dumb
I built one, AMA, no Russians or Chinese government agents pls.
John watch out for the Jerseys! Oh no he can't hear us, he's got air pods in!
**PLEASE READ THIS MESSAGE IN ITS ENTIRETY BEFORE TAKING ACTION.**  Hi there, your post has been removed for one of the following reasons:   * [Rule 3:](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_3-) Askreddit is for open-ended discussion questions. If you've posted a question that could be answered with just yes or no, it needs to explicitly ask for more discussion like asking "What's the story" or "Why or why not?"  Also, questions with a single correct answer, that can be researched elsewhere or provide a limited scope for discussion (yes/no, DAE, polls etc.) are not appropriate. * [Rule 1:](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/wiki/index#wiki_-rule_1-) You must post a clear and direct question in the title.   If you have any queries or concerns, please feel free to [contact the mods](&lt;http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FAskReddit&amp;subject=Yes/No+Related+Post+Review+Request&amp;message=My+post+was+removed,+automoderator+said+Rule+1+or+3,+please review%3a%0d%0a%0d%0ahttp%3A%2F%2Fwww.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/avxy8l/have_you_subbed_to_pewds_yet/&gt;). Thank you.   *I am a bot, and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose/?to=/r/AskReddit) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Great! I hope this means more people will be playing it. It’s a great game and my only complaint so far was lack of human players. It’s fun playing the bots but nothing beats real players. 
100% done on purpose. Architects leave nothing to chance. 
Is wouldn't say it's risky?
Makes me sad you can't bios mod Vega.  I have mine under water so I tried the liquid bios, but 1750mhz is a bit too high to be stable. Wish I could mod it to be like 1720mhz permanently and just go with that, but no such luck. 
It is usually easier with other people, but if a teammate isn’t really playing with the team, has a extremely low survivability frame, or just has no idea on what to do you would probably be better off solo. The best I’ve found to do it solo is to grab a tanky Warframe (I personally use Rhino, but Inaros, Chroma, and most frames with survivability should work as well) and try to get as many index points as possible before cashing in. You get bonus points when you have more than 5, with the bonus capping out when you reach 20 points, so getting 20 before you cash in is recommend. Other than that just avoid dying, and make sure to kill enemies before they can cash in their own points. Also, as long as you have more points than the brokers, you will receive your investment back, even if you do not reach the goal.
I never speak behind the wheel. I already notice slowdowns in my ability to react sometimes (when tired for example) that shouldn't happen  Speaking does diminish your reaction times, even [on speaker](https://youtu.be/_-aDHxoblr4)
Amen! I quit meat for new year been a great 2 months. Never turning back. 
Welp
A zoom out of a boy and a girl playing tetherball on the school blacktop while “The Promise” by Rome plays
Colossi and Roses?
Have a look at the case of Cardinal George Pell, his conviction for child rape in Australia, and the parade of politicians and media blowhards coming out to say how devastated they are -at his conviction-, with not a damn mention of his victims.   To your question, I’d dare say they’d agree raping a child is wrong, but when it comes to a toss up between having some principles and protecting their institutional power structure, self interest wins every single time. And that’s the problem; the kid with a lifetime of pain and anguish is just collateral damage in their obsessive lust for power and control. All in the name of a god that is love and forgiveness. Fucking hypocrites.
This is so sweet I got cavities 
Can you imagine if the republicans never stole elections in 2000? We could have solved the climate crisis at 0.01% of the cost and saved millions of lives by now. 
Is that Minecraft lingerie 
Mirage, because tricking people is fun. If you use him right then you can get enemy positions easier and almost always have the first shot. 
This wouldn't even be an issue if people didn't feel like they were obligated to be pc and could just say that cutting off your dick does not make you a girl.
You obviously don't understand humor or sarcasm. Here's a clue, you are a very perceptive and intelligent person.  😂  
This isn't even modern playable, fuck it probably wouldn't be standard playable even if it was legal.
Moving Parkhurst in the middle is a no-brainer. Shea will have the Beckerman nasty dreadlock defender advantage. 
Girls are women who are younger than me.
I like Cross Armory because a) it’s flush to the receiver, and b) the delrin plug is easily drilled out and replaced if you need to replace the mag or work on the gun. But either one works.
Boy or girl?
Excuse me, it's actually douche bag of dicks
Putain jpensais être le seul à avoir été surpris ptdr
22m here, snap me wokelad
You could use something like this with an XBee module:  [https://www.ebay.com.au/itm/1X-2-Channel-Relay-XBee-BTBee-Shield-for-Arduino-UNO-MEGA-R3-Mega2560-Duemi-T5D8/292939811376?epid=0&amp;hash=item443492ca30:g:-F8AAOSwSfJcUYDu:rk:1:pf:0](https://www.ebay.com.au/itm/1X-2-Channel-Relay-XBee-BTBee-Shield-for-Arduino-UNO-MEGA-R3-Mega2560-Duemi-T5D8/292939811376?epid=0&amp;hash=item443492ca30:g:-F8AAOSwSfJcUYDu:rk:1:pf:0)  I don't know if its supported by Conbee/deCONZ or what firmware would be compatible, somthing to take up with the Conbee/deCONZ developers.  Also if this is going to be connected to mains power conisider the insurance ramifications of connecting DIY electronics to mains, you should only connect certified devices to mains.
Good shit brother
Totally. This has the potential to be amazing. Let's hope they don't screw it up.
Yeah I remember that interview, he did grill him.   I just really can’t stand him, I started listening to Farzetta on 97.5 in the mornings after they moved Gargano to afternoons. He’s another voice I couldn’t take at 6AM.   But Angelo, and some of his callers make me want to get in a bathtub w/ my toaster. That one caller Butch who sings songs when he calls in. I understand that it’s a morning show, and some do that dumb shit, but it’s sports talk radio. Sorry, rant over.
https://www.reddit.com/r/AskPhilosophyFAQ/comments/4ifqi3/im_interested_in_philosophy_where_should_i_start/?st=jspak1sp&amp;sh=185ea451
Maximum floof achieved.
Ok.  And then?
added
I’m a Kirby main. 
I did my whole house in it. Love it
MINOR LOCATED. Mods take em away
Yea, and the guy in the shop was telling me that the RS7 has had quite a few upgrades 
Ha lite fantasi, finns hur mycket som helst :)
I'm already yelling at my TV with excitement for the rolls I'm getting! Good shit Bioware! 😂
Omg that shirt is awesome where did you get it!  Also you look great~
i'm pretty sure that was the intention 
That is a pretty good continuity residual. I would be interested to see the write up.   How many processors per node? Was this a cloud based server or a local HPC? 
You haven't lived until you've worn a bra all day only to take if off as soon as you get home. I wear pretty comfortable bras but fuuuuuck, taking it off at the end of the day is ultimate comfort.
